                              262 of 999 DOCUMENTS

             Copyright (c) 1993 The Catholic University Law Review
                         Catholic University Law Review

                                  WINTER, 1993

                         Catholic University Law Review

                             42 Cath. U.L. Rev. 313

LENGTH: 19181 words

COMMENT: AIR TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA v. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION:
EXCESS BAGGAGE FOR RULES OF AGENCY PROCEDURE.

NAME: Jessica S. Schaffer

TEXT:
 [*313]  Over the past two centuries, Congress has established administrative
agencies as a means to contend with social problems and to regulate specific
activities of individuals and businesses.  n1 Today, these agencies carry out
this function using one or both of two mechanisms: rulemaking and adjudication.
n2 Statutory sources govern the procedure for rulemaking conducted by federal
agencies.  Primarily, agencies conduct rulemaking in accordance with the manner
prescribed by Congress in an agency's enabling statute.  n3 In  [*314]
addition, the Administrative Procedure Act (APA) sets forth requirements that
govern generally agency activity.  n4 Thus, absent specific Congressional
direction, the APA assures a minimum level of procedural compliance.  Congress
alone retains the authority to allow lesser procedural conformance with the APA
when it empowers a specific agency with rulemaking and adjudicatory authority.
n5

   Section 553 of the APA details the procedural requirements that federal
agencies must follow when promulgating rules.  n6 Informal rulemaking under the
APA  n7 necessitates such actions as notification of proposed rulemaking  [*315]
by publication in the Federal Register,  n8 involvement of the general public
through notice and comment,  n9 and adoption of a thirty-day waiting period
before a final rule is made effective and implemented.  n10 Designed to protect
the interests of both the regulated members of the general public  n11 and the
government entity responsible for the regulation of a particular activity, the
APA attempts to strike a balance permitting efficient and effective regulation
while also protecting due process and such other basic concepts of fairness that
a nonrepresentative governmental body might suggest.  n12

    [*316]  Certain types of agency activity, however, relax the tension between
agency efficiency and public participation and justify the inclusion in the APA
of specific exemptions to the procedural requirements of § 553.  n13 For
example, an agency may promulgate interpretations, statements of policy, and
procedural rules without notice and comment according to § 553(b)(A) of the APA.
n14 These types of rules differ from "substantive" -- or "legislative" --
[*317]  rules  n15 that have the force of law, effectively imposing new
obligations and duties or altering the behavior or status of those within the
purview of the proposed rule.  n16 Commentators and courts generally refer to
the "substantive-procedural" dichotomy when discussing procedural rules, but use
the terms "legislative" and "non-legislative" in the context of the APA
exemptions for interpretative rules and general statements of policy.  n17 In
considering the exemptions,  n18 Congress viewed the need for encouraging agency
activity as greater than the need for public participation.  n19 The APA,
however, provides no further elaboration on the scope of the terms  [*318]
"interpretative" or "procedural," and the task of distinguishing the legislative
rule from the non-legislative rule or the substantive rule from the procedural
rule has, in the course of litigation, fallen on the judiciary.  n20

   The exemption for rules of "agency organization, procedure, or practice"
under § 553(b)(A) of the APA and the inherent ambiguity surrounding the
substantive-procedural distinction are currently the subject of considerable
controversy.  In its recent decision Air Transport Association of America v.
Department of Transportation,  n21 the United States Court of Appeals for the
District of Columbia struggled with the task of defining "procedural." The Air
Transport case illustrates well the courts' inability to reach an acceptable
approach for defining the scope of the § 553(b)(A) exemption and for carving out
the court's role in reviewing agency action.  n22

   This Comment examines the notice-and-comment exemption for agency rules of
procedure under § 553(b)(A) of the APA.  In light of the ambiguity posed by the
statutory language and its legislative history, this Comment reviews the
prevailing judicial interpretations governing the scope of the exemption,
including the approaches most recently presented by the majority and dissenting
opinions in Air Transport. Next, this Comment analyzes the different judicial
approaches, evaluating their underlying rationale and identifying their
significance on the rules at issue in the Air Transport case and on rules of
procedure generally.  This Comment then proposes an alternative response to the
issue of defining the term "procedural" based on the cases surveyed and on
analogous policies governing a recent court interpretation of the exemption
under § 553(b)(A) for interpretative rules.  In conclusion, this Comment
proposes that the approach articulated by the court in Air Transport is
sufficiently deficient to render its future prominence unlikely,  [*319]
leaving the position advocated by Judge Silberman in the Air Transport dissent
to prevail.

   I.  VARIED APPROACHES TO ADDRESSING THE SCOPE OF THE EXEMPTION FOR RULES OF
AGENCY ORGANIZATION, PROCEDURE, OR PRACTICE

   The APA represents the culmination of efforts by the executive and
legislative branches of the federal government, as well as private interests, to
reform the structure of administrative agencies.  n23 Congress sought primarily
to introduce uniformity and to secure fairness and administrative impartiality
in light of an increasing dependence on federal agency adjudications.  n24 The
Supreme Court of the United States, which had the opportunity to review the
history and purposes of the APA shortly after its enactment,  n25 characterized
the APA as a "formula upon which opposing social and political forces have come
to rest."  n26

   The legislative history of the APA elaborates on the reasons behind the
congressional action prescribing notice-and-comment rulemaking procedures in §
553.  n27 First, the requirements of a proposed rule's publication and
involvement of the public serve to inform and educate the agency, promoting
reasoned decisionmaking by agencies that conduct rulemaking activities.  n28
Second, inviting an exchange between the public and the administrative agencies
was designed to introduce safeguards to offset the lack of agency accountability
inherent in the administrative scheme.  n29 As the D.C. Circuit recently
acknowledged, "by mandating 'openness, explanation, and [*320]  participatory
democracy' in the rulemaking process, these procedures assure the legitimacy of
administrative norms."  n30

   The legislative history of the APA, however, provides little insight into the
envisioned application of the exemption for interpretative rules, rules of
procedure, and general statements of policy under § 553.  n31 It nonetheless
reveals that the objective of Congress in enacting § 553(b)(A) was to encourage
agency promulgation of certain types of rules and to defer to the agency's
judgment where public input might impede the effectiveness of the administrative
process.  n32 Congress believed that the availability of judicial review
relieved it of the obligation to impose additional procedural burdens where it
regarded public participation as ineffective and unnecessary.  n33

   The ambiguity that courts have encountered when interpreting the exemption
provisions in § 553(b)(A) stems from the substantive-procedural distinction
alluded to by Congress in its legislative history.  n34 Yet the real catalyst
for the controversy surrounding the distinction can be found in Vermont Yankee
Nuclear Power Corp. v. Natural Resources Defense Council, in which the Supreme
Court expressed disapproval of courts' imposing on agencies their view of
acceptable administrative procedures where the APA has delineated minimum
compliance standards.  n35 Vermont Yankee mandated a clear distinction between
the legal bounds of statutory construction, a traditional  [*321]  function of
the judiciary,  n36 and the impermissible practice of demanding additional
procedures beyond those required in the APA.  n37 Complying with the mandate of
Vermont Yankee, however, posed substantial difficulties for courts interpreting
the scope of the exemption under § 553(b)(A), due largely to the inherent
vagueness of the substantive-procedural distinction.  n38

   The ambiguity resulting from form the statutory requirements of § 553(b) f§
553(b)(A), compounded by the uncertainty over the applicability of the Supreme
Court's decision in Vermont Yankee, has produced a variety of judicial judical
approaches for determining whether notice and comment is properly required for
rules characterized as procedural.  In order for agencies to take advantage of
the express authority to circumvent the "cumbersome and time-consuming
mechanisms of public input,"  n39 agencies must first assess which of the
judicial approaches a court is likely to rely upon and which might ultimately
prevail.  These approaches include:  n40 (1) the "substantial impact" test, the
approach most consistently used in adjudicating § 553(b)(A) applicability and
articulated most recently in United States Department of Labor v. Kast Metals
Corp.;  n41 (2) the deviation from the substantial impact test proposed in
Batterton v. Marshall;  n42 (3) the "encod[ing] a substantive value judgment"
inquiry formulated in American Hospital Association v. Bowen;  n43 and finally
(4) the dichotomy presented in Air Transport Association of America v.
Department of Transportation by the majority and dissenting  [*322]  opinions --
the majority identifying "the right to avail oneself of an administrative
adjudication"  n44 as crucial; the dissent advancing the inquiry of whether the
rulemaking "purports to direct, control, or condition the behavior of those
institutions or individuals subject to regulation by the authorizing statute."
n45

   A.  The Substantial Impact Test: United States Department of Labor v. Kast
Metals Corp.

   The substantial impact test, first articulated in 1968 in National Motor
Freight Traffic Association v. United States,  n46 recognizes the need for
notice and comment where agency regulations have a substantial impact on
designated industries or individuals.  n47 As explained in United States
Department of Labor v. Kast Metals Corp., a regulation that "modifies
substantive rights and interests" must withstand the scrutiny and proposed
alternatives of public input.  n48 Because rules with a substantial impact are
at most only "nominally procedural," invocation of the exemption under §
553(b)(A) for rules of procedure is inappropriate.  n49

   Kast Metals presents a recent and thorough illustration of the substantial
impact test.  n50 In that case, the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth
Circuit overturned the district court's determination that the challenged
regulation issued by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)
n51 required notice and comment because it altered the likelihood and frequency
of inspection for employers.  n52 Notwithstanding the conspicuous absence of
notice and comment, the court in Kast Metals upheld the validity of the OSHA
inspection warrant issued to Kast Metals Corporation and ruled that the OSHA
regulation setting forth a new administrative scheme  [*323]  by which the
agency selects employers for routine safety and health inspection was procedural
within the meaning of the APA.  n53 In reversing the lower court's decision,
however, the court of appeals disagreed with the lower court's application of
the facts, but sustained the lower court's use of the substantial impact test.
n54

   Agency regulations that require a departure from previous practice are, on
the other hand, particularly vulnerable under the substantial impact test.  n55
The Kast Metals court, as an example, cited a previous OSHA rule that eliminated
an employer's right to a pre-issuance challenge of an inspection warrant in
favor of ex parte warrant proceedings.  n56 The "180-degree shift in agency
practice" that the rule represented constituted a "substantial impact,"
mandating notice-and-comment rulemaking procedures.  n57 The court concluded,
however, that the OSHA instruction delineating selection for safety inspection
"casts not the stone of substantial impact."  n58 A change in inspection
methodology without the attendant substantial impact is insufficient to warrant
notice and comment.  n59

    [*324]  Recognizing the difficulties that accompany the substance-procedure
distinction,  n60 the court stated that "the substantial impact test is the
primary means by which courts look beyond the label 'procedural' to determine
whether a rule is of the type Congress thought appropriate for public
participation."  n61 However, the court in Kast Metals did not rely on the
substantial impact test without evaluating emerging viewpoints that question its
validity or even reject it outright.  n62

   The Kast Metals court began by addressing the conclusion of the United States
Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit that Vermont Yankee precludes imposing
notice-and-comment requirements for reasons of substantial impact alone.  n63
The Ninth Circuit in Rivera v. Becerra ruled that the substantial impact
approach prevented courts from complying with Vermont Yankee because the inquiry
presents courts with a subtle invitation to substitute their views of the
appropriate level of procedural protection in agency rulemaking.  n64 Rejecting
the reasoning of the Ninth Circuit, the court in Kast Metals asserted that
Vermont Yankee does not apply to the purely legal question of determining
compliance with APA notice-and-comment procedures.  n65 The court concluded that
Vermont Yankee speaks to court action imposing additional procedural
requirements upon agencies above and beyond those required by the APA once the
initial determination of APA compliance has been settled.  n66 The court in Kast
Metals thus separated the threshold question of § 553 applicability from the
concerns voiced in Vermont  [*325]  Yankee. The issue before the court in Kast
Metals -- whether OSHA, in promulgating the inspection instructions, had
fulfilled its requirements under the APA of providing notice and comment -- was
therefore a legal task and well within the province of the courts.  n67 Falling
outside the scope of the Supreme Court's edict in Vermont Yankee, the
substantial impact test remains the appropriate legal test for determining the
procedural nature of an administrative rule.  n68

   The court in Kast Metals continued by distinguishing its case from the
decision of the D.C. Circuit in Cabais v. Egger,  n69 which explicitly rejected
the substantial impact test for the purposes of determining the interpretative
nature of a rule in evaluating the need for notice and comment under §
553(b)(A).  n70 Noting the Cabais court's express intention to limit its holding
to interpretative rules under § 553(b)(A),  n71 the court in Kast Metals adhered
instead to the subsequent D.C. Circuit decision Lamoille Valley Railroad Co. v.
ICC.  n72 Lamoille Valley demonstrated the D.C. Circuit's continued intention to
rely on the substantial impact test for determining the procedural nature of a
rule.  n73 That decision thus dispelled any ambiguity as to the applicability of
Cabais to procedural rules and indicated that the substantial impact test,
although rejected for interpretative rules, was still alive and well for
determining the exempt status of procedural rules.  n74

   The underlying grounds for adhering to the well-established, if somewhat
unsatisfactory,  n75 substantial impact test persisted, and the desire to act in
[*326]  conformance with congressional intent served to uphold the substantial
impact test once again.  n76 The Kast Metals court, in imposing the substantial
impact test, was aware of the competing interests at stake and attempted to
secure fairness and accuracy without permitting agencies to resort casually to
expedited rulemaking in reliance on one of the available exemptions.  n77 In
Kast Metals, however, the court found that the OSHA instruction had "no
cognizable impact, substantial or otherwise, on any right or interest of Kast."
n78 To require notice and comment for the OSHA regulation would vitiate
Congress' intent and, in effect, eliminate the exemption for rules of procedure,
for, as the court recognized,"[a]ll agency rules will in some way affect those
within the agency's grasp."  n79

   B.  Looking for an Alternative: Batterton v. Marshall

   The D.C. Circuit's recognition in Kast Metals that the substantial impact
test is not entirely satisfactory as a mechanism for evaluating the substantive-
procedural distinction  n80 is typical of many decisions exploring the scope of
the exemption under § 553(b)(A).  n81 Procedural rules, no matter how
inconsequential,  [*327]  inevitably affect private parties within their scope
in some manner.  n82 In addition, the notion that the substantial impact test
served to remove some procedural rules from the scope of the exemption raised
the question of the test's validity under Vermont Yankee.  n83 Batterton v.
Marshall  n84 addressed these concerns and established a shift in emphasis,
moving away from the substantial impact inquiry and focusing instead on the
future weight of the challenged rule or regulation.  n85

   In Batterton, the state of Maryland challenged a rulemaking by the Department
of Labor (DOL) that modified the method for calculating unemployment rates.  n86
The results of these calculations provided the basis for the allocation of funds
under the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act (CETA), a federally-funded
program that monitored job training and placement guidance.  n87 The new method,
termed the "Balance of State" procedure, used as its source data derived from
monthly Census Bureau surveys of sample households, ultimately adjusting the
figures to meet the statistics of the entire state.  n88 In contrast, the
"Handbook" method, the procedure employed previously by DOL to determine
Maryland's need for aid, relied on the reports of state employment security
agencies.  n89 When the change in  [*328]  methodology produced a significant
reduction of CETA funds, Maryland filed suit in federal district court seeking
declaratory and injunctive relief.  n90

   In its review of the lower court's decision,  n91 the Batterton court held
that the agency's change in statistical methodology did not qualify for
exemption from § 553 notice-and-comment procedures.  n92 Concluding that the
change was "hardly a 'routine correction or refinement,'" the court stated that
the challenged rulemaking "bears all the earmarks of conclusive agency action,
governing the rights and interests of the public."  n93 Accordingly, any future
DOL action designed to alter the means by which CETA disbursements are allocated
must be implemented following the notice-and-comment procedures prescribed by
the APA.  n94

   Rather than evaluating the agency's procedures in light of the substantial
impact created by DOL's action, the Batterton court approached the issue by
considering the "legal status and effect" of the challenged rulemaking in future
judicial and administrative proceedings.  n95 The court regarded this
characterization of agency action as crucial to a proper evaluation of the
applicability of the exemption from notice and comment under § 553(b)(A).  n96
The goals that Congress sought to achieve by imposing the requirements of notice
and comment on agencies embarking on the task of  [*329]  rulemaking provided
the Batterton court with the basis for its approach.  n97 Distinguishing between
the "legislative" and "non-legislative" nature of agency action permits
reviewing courts to determine whether Congress intended the exemption to apply.
n98 Where an agency is contemplating regulatory provisions that it intends to be
legally binding on all affected parties, the protective features of advance
notice and public comment are mandated.  n99 In contrast, agency actions issued
without such protective features command less deference, serving merely to
notify the public of the agency's policies and understanding of the laws, and to
organize better the agency's daily operations.  n100

   In addressing the exemption for procedural rules under § 553(b)(A), the court
in Batterton nevertheless employed language that distinctly resembled the
"substantial impact" test.  n101 The court concluded that since the
newly-adopted statistical methodology changed the "one undefined variable in the
statutory fund allocation formula," it is governed by the standards for informal
rulemaking as defined in § 553.  n102 The consequences of DOL's action
effectively removed this arguably procedural rule from the scope of the
exemption.

   The Batterton court completed its analysis with a discussion of the court's
authority to review agency action in light of recent claims that Vermont Yankee
precludes courts from imposing procedures beyond those articulated in the APA.
n103 Consistent with its treatment of Vermont Yankee in Kast Metals, the court
rejected the arguments advanced by DOL and held that the warning issued by the
Supreme Court in Vermont Yankee was directed at courts confronted with the issue
of whether sufficient procedures accompanied the rulemaking process when agency
compliance with APA requirements had already been established.  n104 Because the
claim against DOL raised the threshold issue of whether the agency had complied
with the notice-and-comment procedures detailed in § 553 of the APA, Vermont
Yankee  [*330]  simply did not apply.  n105 The court concluded that construing
the statutory exemption from notice-and-comment requirements to determine the
procedural sufficiency under the APA of DOL's changed statistical methodology is
an entirely appropriate function of the court.  n106 Furthermore, by asserting
that it did not rely on the substantial impact test, the court did not need to
address DOL's contention that the substantial impact test suggests possible
inappropriate judicial intervention.  n107

   C.  Identifying Rules that "Encode a Substantive Value Judgment": American
Hospital Association v. Bowen

   As conceded by the D.C. Circuit in Batterton, the substantial impact test
continued to enjoy significant support despite its inadequacies.  n108 Yet,
courts still contended with the problem of determining the degree of substantial
impact permitted under the exemption for procedural rules and Vermont Yankee.
n109 Seeking a more satisfactory approach to defining the scope of the
exemptions in § 553(b)(A), American Hospital Association v. Bowen  n110 followed
Batterton's lead: "The gradual move away from looking solely into the
substantiality of the impact reflects a candid recognition that even
unambiguously procedural measures affect parties to some degree."  n111 Drawing
from Batterton, the court in American Hospital emphasized the effect of a rule
on the rights and obligations of the regulated public as Congress established in
an agency's enabling statute and distinguished these rights and obligations from
the incidental effects that any change in agency regulations may produce,
regardless of their substantiality.  n112 Thus, the more pointed question posed
by the court in American Hospital was "whether the agency action also encodes a
substantive value judgment or puts a stamp of approval  [*331]  or disapproval
on a given type of behavior."  n113 Under American Hospital, therefore, the
substantial impact test has a second prong.  In the event that a court finds
that an agency's action causes a substantial impact, the court must further
determine whether that substantial impact is directly associated with the
activities, rights, or obligations that Congress intended to regulate in
establishing the agency and its powers.

   In American Hospital, the court contemplated an array of rules implementing
the peer review organization (PRO) program established by Congress in its 1982
amendment to the Medicare Act,  n114 including three documents that defined the
procedures for the private review contractors.  n115 These documents, by which
the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) detailed such measures as
notification of hospitals, random hospital admission reviews, and rigid scrutiny
for areas susceptible to abuse,  n116 were designed to provide the PROs with
guidelines for conducting their reviews and to draw attention to situations in
which HHS expected review to be the most productive and effective.  n117

   The court in American Hospital rejected the American Hospital Association's
(AHA) claim that HHS had promulgated directives implementing the 1982 amendment
to the Medicare Act without the notice and comment required  [*332]  under § 553
of the APA.  n118 Premising its decision upon the policy goals behind affording
notice and comment, the court sought to further preserve the narrow scope of the
exemptions and require agencies to follow notice-and-comment procedures in all
but the clearest instances in which the exemptions apply.  n119 Yet, the
challenged regulations in American Hospital presented the court with precisely
such an instance: the HHS directives constituted "classic procedural rules,
exempt under that distinctive prong of § 553."  n120

   The "encoding a substantive value judgment" language espoused in American
Hospital sustained Batterton's emphasis on preserving the procedural
classification, a classification that Congress deliberately created.  n121 By
focusing only on the interests that are ultimately at stake, namely those
established by Congress in an agency's enabling statute,  n122 the court was
able to limit the overinclusiveness of the substantial impact test and give
effect to the intended purpose of the procedural rule exemption.

   The impetus for reworking the substantial impact test was derived in large
part from the 1978 Supreme Court decision in Vermont Yankee.  n123 Courts and
litigants continued to struggle with Vermont Yankee's applicability to court
determinations concerning the scope of the exemptions under § 553.  n124  [*333]
The Supreme Court, in the following year, considered the fine line between a
court's obligation to insist on full compliance with APA procedures and a
court's impermissible intrusion when it substitutes what it believes to be
adequate procedures.  n125 Articulating a standard by which a court could
recognize when it is either disrupting or maintaining this "balance,"  n126
however, became troublesome in light of the ambiguity in defining the term "
procedural." In American Hospital, the court revealed its intention to define
procedural rules as those that "do not themselves alter the rights or interests
of parties, although [they] may alter the manner in which parties present
themselves or their viewpoints to the agency."  n127

   D.  One Step Forward or Two Steps Back: Air Transport Association of America
v. Department of Transportation

1.  The Right to Avail Oneself of an Administrative Adjudication

   The Batterton and American Hospital courts were guided by Vermont Yankee and
the desire to preserve the express exemption for rules of procedure.  These
objectives, however, necessarily infringed upon the court's ability to provide
procedural protections where it viewed the need for public participation as
paramount.  Attempting to regain a foothold over this area, the D.C. Circuit
formulated yet another approach to resolving the issue of the scope of the
exemption under § 553(b)(A) in Air Transport Association of America v.
Department of Transportation.  n128 Inquiring whether the challenged Rules of
Practice "substantially affect civil penalty defendants' 'right to avail
[themselves] of an administrative adjudication,'"  n129 the court reasserted its
authority to review the scope of the exemption and invalidated the challenged
regulatory action for inadequate procedural compliance.  n130

    [*334]  Judge Edwards, writing for the majority in Air Transport,
invalidated rules promulgated without notice and comment by the Federal Aviation
Administration (FAA).  n131 The regulations at issue in Air Transport  n132
provided for the manner in which the FAA was to prosecute violations of the
Federal Aviation Act under the expanded enforcement authority granted by
Congress in its Civil Penalty Assessment Demonstration Program legislation.
n133 As the agency explained, the Rules of Practice embodied "the procedures
utilized to enforce the FAA's substantive aviation safety regulations in the
smaller civil penalty cases."  n134 The regulations served to bring its existing
procedural rules into conformance with the more formal, trial-like procedures of
notice and hearing under § 554 of the APA, which Congress explicitly required
for all civil penalty actions.  n135 No longer required to submit findings to
the United States Attorney for prosecution of civil penalty  [*335]  actions
under $ 50,000,  n136 the FAA published the Rules of Practice in their final
form and for immediate adoption on September 7, 1988, announcing the inadequacy
of its existing rules and the temporary nature of the enforcement authority as
grounds for proceeding without the notice-and-comment period.  n137 Governing
such aspects of the civil penalty action as filing of the complaint, service of
documents, discovery, evidence, record, and appeals, the Rules of Practice
encompass the necessary and available agency procedures once a party charged
with a violation has requested a hearing.  n138

   Representing the interests of private airlines, the Air Transport Association
of America (Air Transport or Association) challenged the Rules of Practice
following notice of final agency action in the Federal Register.  n139 Air
Transport claimed that the rules imposed a significant hardship on its members
currently engaged in litigating actions before the FAA.  n140 Citing numerous
instances where the Rules favor the agency, the Association argued that no
equivalent beneficial features were afforded to parties defending  [*336]
against cited violations.  n141 In the words of the Association, the Rules of
Practice "create[d] unparalleled bias in favor of the agency in litigation of
penalty cases."  n142 Contending that the interests of the public require
procedural conformance with § 553, the Association argued that the burdens that
the rules impose on defending parties would subject airlines to a greater
likelihood of an increased penalty assessment, resulting in sufficient prejudice
to warrant the imposition of public participation through notice-and-comment
procedures.  n143 Thus, in addition to substantive claims that the rules
violated due process rights and the FAA's enabling statute, the Association
sought to compel compliance with the required notice-and-comment procedures of §
553.  n144 The agency defended its action by characterizing the Rules of
Practice as procedural and by advancing its post-promulgation consideration of
industry comment.  n145

   The court in Air Transport recognized the inadequacies of a substantive-
procedural distinction  n146 and adhered to a line of cases employing a
"functional analysis" instead.  n147 Focusing on the fact that the challenged
procedures implicate the defendant's rights in a civil penalty hearing, the
court  [*337]  held that "[t]he Penalty Rules . . . affect the entire range of
adjudicatory rights guaranteed by the due process clause, the APA and [the
Demonstration Program] -- matters far too important to be withdrawn from public
deliberation."  n148 The majority relied heavily on prior law requiring notice
and comment for agency action that disrupts the availability of administrative
hearings and cited the court's holding in National Motor Freight Traffic
Association v. United States as controlling.  n149 The nature of the rules alone
and their potential consequences provide the relevant inquiry for determining
whether the exemption from informal rulemaking procedures under § 553(b)(A)
applies.  n150 The court thus narrowly construed the exemption for rules of
procedure, removing from its scope all rules that pertain to a party's right to
an administrative hearing.  n151

   The court in Air Transport reasoned that because the FAA Rules of Practice
were directed at the administrative hearings in which the agency imposes civil
penalties for aviation safety violations,  n152 courts must use particular care
in discerning the validity of the challenged rulemaking.  n153 An agency can
easily manipulate procedures such as the Rules of Practice, leaving the
defendant in a vulnerable position.  n154 Considering this potential for bias,
the court explained that "the FAA made discretionary -- indeed, in many cases,
highly contentious -- choices concerning what process civil penalty defendants
are due."  n155 Interpreting American Hospital to preclude this type of
administrative action without the procedural precautions of public
participation, the court likened the FAA regulations to those that "encode[] a
substantive value judgment."  n156 The court did, however, recognize the
exemption for procedural rules as a valuable means of accomplishing
organizational matters within an agency, but limited the use of the exemption to
"housekeeping measure[s]."  n157

    [*338]  The Air Transport formulation sought to put an end to the
uncertainty left unaddressed by Vermont Yankee and to reaffirm the court's
function of review over administrative agencies, in particular when a
defendant's adjudicatory rights are implicated.  n158 In response to the
dissenting view in Air Transport, which advocated the procedural nature of the
penalty rules, the court noted only briefly that reliance on Vermont Yankee is
misplaced where the issue is confined to determining compliance with the APA.
n159 Furthermore, congressional intent can only be properly observed when courts
scrutinize the procedural adequacy of regulatory activity that affects the
rights of the regulated public, unlike the more arbitrary procedural-substantive
distinction, which focuses on "classes of rights."  n160 In other words, the
majority contends that looking at the degree of substantial impact is altogether
inappropriate and that only internal agency procedures of no conceivable
interest to the public fall within the ambit of the exemption for rules of
agency organization, procedure, or practice.  The Air Transport court's
rejection of the substantive-procedural distinction represents a significant
departure from previous case law, which generally acknowledged the  [*339]
difficulties inherent in the substantive-procedural distinction, but
nevertheless adhered consistently to its basic mandate.  n161

2.  The Primary Conduct Test

   In sharp contrast, Judge Silberman's dissenting opinion admonished the
majority for dispensing with the statutory mandate to distinguish between
substantive and procedural rules.  n162 To effectuate congressional intent,
Judge Silberman suggested that the penalty rules be upheld because they bear on
the procedures to be followed in civil penalty hearings rather than on aviation
safety directly.  n163 The dissent further reasoned that the Supreme Court in
Vermont Yankee clearly cautioned reviewing courts against imposing procedural
protections in addition to those required under the APA.  n164

   The dissent found force in the contention that courts are not at leisure to
disregard the substantive-procedural distinction upon which the APA exemption
rests.  n165 "Congress . . . made that difference critical, and we are therefore
obliged to implement a viable distinction between 'procedural' rules and those
that are substantive."  n166 The viable distinction that Judge Silberman
formulated assigns to the term "substantive" all rules that affect primary
conduct and designates all those at the periphery as "procedural."  n167
Accordingly, the inquiry must be whether "a given regulation  [*340]  purports
to direct, control, or condition the behavior of those institutions or
individuals subject to regulation by the authorizing statute" thereby rendering
it substantive in nature and subject to notice-and-comment rulemaking
procedures.  n168 As for the FAA Rules of Practice, these exemplify "by ample
measure" the type of rules that a court should classify as procedural and
therefore sustain, even if promulgated without the notice and comment delineated
in § 553.  n169

   Judge Silberman, relying on American Hospital, conceded that agency activity
may not always fall neatly into the categories of "substantive" or "procedural."
n170 The decision in American Hospital managed to isolate successfully the
procedural nature of the challenged rulemaking even though the PRO directives
were likely to cause hospitals to experience increased costs and treat certain
medical procedures with reluctance.  n171 Only rulemaking activity that
implicates directly the subject matter of the congressional act -- here, the
safety standards prescribed by Congress in the Federal Aviation Act and its
amendments -- must fall within the substantive arena obligating careful
collaboration with interested members of the public.  n172 The dissent concluded
that enforcement schemes and systems for adjudicating claims should remain in
the procedural arena and should not be removed merely because regulated parties
seek to protect the status quo.  n173 Judge Silberman criticized the majority
for its concern with sorting out the "important" rules for purposes of
determining the applicability of notice and comment.  Congress by its exemption
deemed the informal rulemaking procedures unnecessary for certain rules, not
because of their lack of importance, but because agency effectiveness and
efficiency superseded the need for procedural protections.  n174

    [*341]  II.  THE EFFECT OF THE AIR TRANSPORT RULING ON THE EXEMPTION FOR
RULES OF AGENCY ORGANIZATION, PROCEDURE, OR PRACTICE

   The Air Transport decision left in its wake considerable uncertainty as to
the appropriate method for determining the scope of § 553(b)(A).  n175 The
decision imposes an even greater task on agencies which must now consider the
validity of conflicting approaches if they wish to determine whether the
notice-and-comment requirements of § 553 apply.  n176 Agencies, in an attempt to
avoid the consequences of judicial review and the potential invalidation of
their rulemaking, will likely promulgate procedural rules with the full panoply
of prescribed procedures under the APA.  n177 This reaction is contrary to
Congressional intent, which by explicit exemptions sought to encourage agency
action in certain areas where the need for notice and comment was considered to
be dispensable.  n178

   Judge Silberman aptly characterized the source of the ambiguity surrounding
the exemption for rules of agency organization, procedure, or practice in his
description of agency rulemaking as a "continuum" on which some rules clearly
find themselves at either the substantive or the procedural end.  n179 This
approach categorizes as "substantive" those rules that directly affect the
activity over which Congress granted the agency regulatory authority, in direct
contrast to "procedural" rules, which govern subsidiary agency activity such as
the enforcement or adjudication of claims.  n180 However, as the Rules of
Practice challenged in Air Transport demonstrate, many  [*342]  rules do not fit
at either end of the continuum, and, because of their contentious nature, fall
into an ambiguous area where the two characteristics overlap.  n181 While none
of the judicial approaches conclusively resolves the ambiguity surrounding
procedural rules, the approach articulated in American Hospital, excluding from
the notice-and-comment exemption those rules which "also encode[] a substantive
value judgment," proposes the more reasonable solution to defining the scope of
§ 553(b)(A).  n182

   The substantial impact test, as the precursor to the American Hospital
formulation, remains a valuable source of insight for making sense of the
exemption under § 553(b)(A) and the substantive-procedural distinction which
governs that exemption for rules of procedure.  n183 While the substantial
impact test remains important to the substantive-procedural distinction, it has
not managed to escape entirely unscathed.  "[T]he continued viability of the
'substantial impact' test, as it simply articulates one of several criteria for
evaluating claims of exemption from § 553" was recognized by the D.C. Circuit in
Batterton.  n184 Yet the Batterton court relied on an alternative method for
making sense of the substantive-procedural distinction, looking rather to the
judicial weight to be accorded agency action under the exemption.  n185 By
classifying rules as legislative and non-legislative, the Batterton court
emphasized "the legal force of the agency action in future proceedings."  n186
Notice-and-comment procedures elevate legislative rules and make them less
susceptible to criticism and legal action.  n187 Only if promulgated in a manner
that a court deems "arbitrary, capricious, an abuse of discretion, or otherwise
not in accordance with law" will the notice-and-comment regulation be set aside.
n188 On the other hand, non-legislative rules, such as rules of procedure,
gather force over time, acquiring precedential value only upon surviving
judicial scrutiny, and at the outset "carry no more weight on judicial  [*343]
review than their inherent persuasiveness commands."  n189 The Batterton court
was thus able to resolve some of the problems of the substantial impact test
raised since Vermont Yankee.  n190

   Additional decisions revealed the courts' reluctance to rely on the
substantial impact test.  The Ninth Circuit rejected the test as the appropriate
inquiry governing issues of exemption for rules of procedure,  n191 but the D.C.
Circuit's decision in Cabais had a more lasting effect when it discarded the
test as the method for ascertaining a rule's interpretative status.  n192 An
interpretative rule announces "what the administrative officer thinks the
statute or regulation means."  n193 Courts do not evaluate these interpretative
rules under § 553(b)(A) according to the substantial impact of the agency
interpretation, but rather according to an agency's intent to issue a
legislative rule and the presence of "gaps" requiring interstitial rulemaking in
conjunction with notice and comment.  n194

   The D.C. Circuit abandoned the substantial impact test in the context of
interpretative rules based on its recognition that, by their very nature, such
rules may "vitally affect private interests."  n195 In Cabais, the court
justified its decision to forego notice and comment, even in the presence of a
substantial impact, by stating that "strict adherence to the letter of the APA
without  [*344]  reference to 'elementary fairness'" is paramount where Congress
expressly designated interpretative rules for expedited rulemaking.  n196 The
alternative methods for obtaining relief tend to mitigate the harshness of the
rule espoused by the Cabais court.  n197 Injured parties, the court explained,
can seek judicial relief from the adverse effects of interpretative rules in
related enforcement proceedings.  n198 Furthermore, courts in such enforcement
proceedings generally do not grant the deference that accompanies
notice-and-comment rulemaking to interpretative rules where an agency has opted
to forego public input in favor of immediate promulgation and accelerated
effectiveness.  n199 These reasons provided ample justification for the Cabais
court to adopt the more lenient test for interpretative rules, notwithstanding
the precedent that supports the substantial impact test.

   The courts, however, were not inclined to follow the same approach for rules
of agency procedure.  n200 Lamoille Valley, a subsequent decision by the D.C.
Circuit, continued to rely on the substantial impact test for analyzing the
substantive-procedural distinction.  n201 Following that decision, other courts
reasserted the substantial impact test as a strong influence in cases concerning
rules of agency procedure.  n202 The "encod[ing] a substantive value judgment"
language of American Hospital basically preserved the substantial impact test,
although it broadened the inquiry to avoid losing the exemption entirely.  n203
For as the court in that case recognized, under the  [*345]  substantial impact
test, procedural rules will likely not qualify for the exemption under §
553(b)(A) because of their inevitable impact.  n204 The American Hospital test,
like the decision in Cabais rejecting the substantial impact test for
interpretative rules, rested upon the notion that rules under the exemption are
likely to affect substantially the interests of private parties.  n205

   The American Hospital decision illustrates the D.C. Circuit's move away from
the substantial impact test.  n206 Concluding that the claims of the challenging
party were not legitimate where the concern for a greater likelihood of
discovering excessive reimbursements was exactly that which the Medicare
amendment sought to achieve, the court brought the HHS documents within the
scope of the exemption for procedural rules despite the substantial impact that
the complaining hospitals anticipated.  n207 But only the broadened inquiry of
whether the challenged procedural rule "also encodes a substantive value
judgment or puts a stamp of approval or disapproval on a given type of behavior"
serves to bring the PRO manuals within the scope of the exemption, since it was
undisputed that hospitals inside the PRO territories would perceive the effect
of heightened scrutiny under the modified enforcement scheme.  n208 The American
Hospital formulation thus effectively limited the substantial impact test and
its potential reach, placing the procedural directives promulgated by HHS within
the express exemption that Congress deemed appropriate.

   Like the PRO directives in American Hospital, the FAA Rules of Practice
challenged in Air Transport speak to the procedures accompanying the FAA's
enforcement scheme.  Whereas American Hospital dealt with rules governing the
investigatory and supervisory aspects of enforcement,  n209 the Air Transport
rules provide the procedures for the hearing stage of a civil penalty action.
The FAA Rules of Practice do not alter the standards of safety compliance, and
thus indirectly the behavior of the member airlines of the Air Transport
Association, the crucial "substantive value judgment"  [*346]  called for in
American Hospital.  n210 As suggested by the court in Cabais, the Air Transport
Association has other means of seeking redress.  n211 Judicial review after an
administrative adjudication concerning specific violations of the Federal
Aviation Act or its enabling regulations provides disgruntled parties with the
valuable safeguard needed to protect against inadequacies resulting from
abbreviated rulemaking.  n212 Furthermore, rules promulgated without notice and
comment are not entitled to special deference from reviewing courts.  n213 These
alternative protections served as justification for abandoning the substantial
impact test for interpretative rules and should be equally significant in the
context of procedural rules.

   For these reasons, the FAA Rules of Practice would likely survive the
American Hospital inquiry, a result contrary to the Air Transport decision
itself.  n214 While the Air Transport case continues to carry precedential
value,  n215 the methodology it uses to determine the procedural weight of the
Rules of Practice is sufficiently flawed to render future prominence unlikely.
The significantly narrower construction of § 553(b)(A) formulated by the Air
Transport majority, focusing on whether the rules "substantially affect civil
penalty defendants' 'right to avail [themselves] of an administrative
adjudication,'"  n216 rests on an early articulation of the D.C. Circuit in
National Motor Freight. In National Motor Freight, the decision by the
Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC) to resolve the claims of reparations for
past illegal rates by means of informal settlement had "palpable effects" upon
other industry members and embodied precisely the type of action that would
benefit from the information gathered in a notice-and-comment type rulemaking.
n217 Yet, the agency action in National Motor Freight differed  [*347]
significantly from the action in Air Transport, and one must carefully consider
Judge Edward's complete reliance on that decision.  n218

   While both decisions concern the adjudicatory rights of regulated parties,
the court in National Motor Freight justified its decision to invalidate the
rulemaking largely on the absence of any Congressional direction to establish
the challenged informal settlement procedures.  n219 The legislative act that
prompted the ICC rulemaking specified the need for a judicial remedy for
aggrieved parties and expressly restricted the agency from initiating
prosecutorial action.  n220 By contrast, the FAA was "under . . . injunction
from Congress" to promulgate the Rules of Practice.  n221 The Civil Penalty
Assessment Demonstration Program explicitly required the FAA to render all
penalty assessments "only after notice and opportunity for a hearing on the
record in accordance with [§ ]554" of the APA.  n222 Courts have generally
distinguished between rules whereby "an agency is merely explicating Congress'
desires from those . . . in which [an] agency is adding substantive content of
its own."  n223 The established authority by which the FAA promulgated the Rules
of Practice and the specifically prescribed objective  [*348]  that these were
designed to meet, only detract from the significance accorded National Motor
Freight by the majority opinion.  n224

   Perhaps more troubling is the effort of the majority in Air Transport to
establish different levels of scrutiny for determining the applicability of the
exemption based on the type of procedural rule that is being questioned.
Recognizing the continued validity of the American Hospital decision, the court
in Air Transport commented that "the public has no legitimate interest in
influencing an agency's 'discretionary deployment of enforcement resources,' . .
. a classic 'internal' matter essential to how an agency constitutes itself."
n225 The court stated that, similar to the enforcement directives in American
Hospital, agency rules that somehow particularize the manner in which private
parties apply for benefits also qualify as internal agency operations exempt
from notice and comment.  n226 Thus, the Air Transport court reasoned that the
decision by the D.C. Circuit to sustain the abbreviated rulemaking procedures
contested in Neighborhood TV Co. v. FCC  n227 was not inconsistent with its
decision.  n228 In Neighborhood TV, the rules concerned interim measures
governing the processing of license applications while the agency, the Federal
Communications Commission, contemplated a change in policy concerning low power
television stations.  n229 Although the interim procedures mandated a processing
freeze for certain applications,  n230 they "did not affect any component of a
party's statutory or constitutional right to avail himself of an administrative
adjudication."  n231 However, the Air Transport court was unable to demonstrate
adequately its proposed distinction between a rulemaking that implicates
enforcement strategies or benefit application procedures and a rulemaking that
alters a party's adjudicatory rights.  As Batterton revealed, the Department of
Labor's adoption of a new methodology for calculating unemployment rates can
have impermissible consequences on the benefits received.  n232 Air Transport's
"bright line test" focusing on rules that encumber adjudicatory rights is
inconsistent  [*349]  with the language of the exemption provision of § 553,
which alludes to no such interpretation.  n233 Whereas the Rules of Practice in
Air Transport represent such rules, affecting the manner in which administrative
civil penalty trials themselves are brought, they no more than other enforcement
practices or disbursement schemes suggest the importance of notice-and-comment
procedures, no matter how appealing the assurance of fundamental fairness and
thoughtful deliberation derived from public participation may be.  n234 Neither
the language of the APA nor the judicial interpretations that have followed
support this ambitious effort to separate rules that detail procedures for an
administrative adjudication from agency action that governs enforcement schemes,
license applications, or rate calculations.

   The dissenting opinion in Air Transport revealed an approach that is far more
consistent with the judicial trend of retreating from the substantial impact
test and moving in the direction of furthering congressional intent concerning
the promulgation of procedural rules.  n235 The "substantial impact" that Judge
Silberman proposed as appropriate for notice-and-comment rulemaking is the
impact perceived from any rule that affects the conduct of private parties as
contemplated by the authorizing statute and its regulations.  n236 The standard
recommended by Judge Silberman does not validate the Association's argument that
the rules infringe on basic notions of fairness and due process rights.  This
issue is appropriately addressed as "an entirely separate matter which can be
raised in a concrete setting."  n237 Imposing one's views on whether procedural
rulemaking would be more satisfactory  [*350]  if accompanied by notice and
comment is entirely inappropriate where Congress has addressed the matter.  n238

   Judge Silberman's dissent demonstrates an attempt to formulate the American
Hospital inquiry in different terms.  The objective of this formulation is to
articulate more clearly what is at the core of the substantive-procedural
distinction: exposing regulation that affects primary conduct to the procedural
safeguards of notice and comment.  The dissent underscores the deficiencies of
the majority opinion and remains faithful to congressional intent by allowing
the exemption to accommodate more than simply the most "insignificant rules."
n239

   III.  COMMENT: TO WHAT EXTENT SHOULD THE COURTS PERMIT AGENCIES TO PROMULGATE
PROCEDURAL RULES WITHOUT NOTICE AND COMMENT AS CONTEMPLATED IN § 553(b)(A) OF
THE APA?

   The reasons that prompted the D.C. Circuit in Cabais to abandon the
longstanding substantial impact test for interpretative rules suggest that rules
of procedure might also benefit from a similar upheaval.  n240 Citing Vermont
Yankee, the Cabais court concluded that the substantial impact test was
insufficiently accurate to distinguish properly between interpretative and
legislative rulemaking for purposes of determining the applicability of the
exemption under § 553(b)(A).  n241 As in Batterton, the court recognized the
test as "one of several criteria" which comprise the exemption inquiry, but
explicitly rejected its validity as the primary means for settling the issue of
that exemption's scope because of its tendency towards overinclusiveness.  n242
Interpretative rules will invariably render explanations that private parties
will find undesirable and intolerable for the burdens that they impose.  n243
Curiously enough, the court in Cabais noted that the substantial impact test may
still be applicable to statements of general policy under § 553(b)(A) and agency
action governed by "good cause" under § 553(b)(B), but refrained from making any
comment concerning the procedural rule exemption.  n244 Ultimately, what guided
the Cabais court in its decision was "strict adherence to the letter of the
APA," the availability of alternative judicial remedies  [*351]  for aggrieved
parties, and the judicial weight that courts will assign to abbreviated
administrative rulemaking.  n245

   These considerations have led courts to question previous adherence to the
substantial impact test for the purpose of evaluating the substantive-procedural
distinction.  As illustrated by the American Hospital decision, courts
successfully contend with the broad reach of the substantial impact test by
inquiring further whether the agency action affects interests beyond the scope
of the enabling act and its regulations.  n246 The Batterton court noted the
inadequacies of the substantial impact test and instead relied on the judicial
deference that notice-and-comment rulemaking invokes in contrast to abbreviated
procedures.  n247 Finally, the Air Transport dissent recognized the failing of
the courts in imposing the significant burdens of notice and comment where
alternative avenues for redress provide adequate relief.  n248

   The role of the challenged agency regulation to the enabling statute is also
significant in the determination of the exemption's applicability.  Disregarded
by the Air Transport court, this criterion seeks to establish whether the
authorizing congressional act suggested a need for the agency action.  As the
dissent in Air Transport recognized, Congress specifically called for
administrative adjudications in accordance with § 554 of the APA, thereby
requiring the FAA to implement rules in order to comply with that standard.
n249 Unlike the factual circumstances in National Motor Freight, which provided
no such congressional backing,  n250 the Demonstration Program in Air Transport
gave the court no reason to doubt the authority supporting the Rules of
Practice.  n251 Additionally, the Air Transport rules did not constitute
gap-filling measures, rising to the level of substantive rulemaking, for
Congress nowhere, either explicitly or implicitly, mandated that the agency
employ its expertise in detailing specific statutory provisions.  n252

   The considerations that guided the Cabais court in its decision for
interpretative rules are equally relevant and insightful when considering
procedural rules.  Congress, in creating the exemption, established that the
promulgation of procedural rules should be governed by different concerns which
supersede the benefits of public participation.  n253 Encouraging agency  [*352]
action and thereby promoting efficiency and effectiveness were the objectives
that Congress sought to achieve.  n254 Courts should be less reluctant to
recognize the validity of procedural rules and should permit the corresponding
exemption to coexist with notice-and-comment rulemaking where alternative
safeguards exist and the agency is acting pursuant to congressional mandate.

   IV.  CONCLUSION

   Past decisions addressing the exemption for rules of agency organization,
procedure, or practice demonstrate the elusiveness of a bright line test that
allows for easy characterization of rulemaking activity and defines in clear
terms the scope of the exemption under § 553(b)(A) of the APA.  Because of the
explicit congressional mandate to exempt such rules, courts must address the
ambiguity of the exemption rather than simply adopt the position that rules of
procedure, because of the inherent impact on members of the general public, be
accompanied by notice and opportunity for comment.  n255 Air Transport portrays
the "idiosyncratic" nature of past court decisions that confront the
substantive-procedural distinction for rules of procedure under § 553.  n256 The
Air Transport court's efforts to arrive at a "facile semantic distinction,"
n257 however, stand on shaky ground.  Largely ignoring the significant
observations made over the past decade in decisions interpreting the exemption
provision, the court in Air Transport imposed strict notice-and-comment
compliance for procedural rules such as the FAA Rules of Practice.

   Agencies presently embarking on rulemaking under the exemption of § 553(b)(A)
must anticipate the likelihood of increased scrutiny where adjudicatory
procedures are involved and a party's right to an administrative hearing is
implicated.  While the imposition of notice-and-comment procedures in such
instances arguably represents the judicially engrafted procedures that Vermont
Yankee so firmly criticized, it will ultimately only serve  [*353]  to impede
the efficient and effective operation of administrative agencies.  Agencies
wishing to avoid preliminary procedural challenges have no choice but to engage
in notice-and-comment procedures -- and the accompanying expense and
inconvenience -- in order to secure the judicial deference that such legislative
rules command.  There are many reasons why an agency may choose to adopt
procedures for public participation,  n258 but the explicit exemption in §
553(b)(A) should prevent courts from making that judgment on behalf of agencies
and narrowing the scope of the exemption's intended application.

   When an agency promulgates procedural rules in direct response to
Congressional legislation, the presence of alternative safeguards should caution
against imposing notice-and-comment procedures.  The Rules of Practice in Air
Transport present no exigent circumstances that might warrant the more stringent
approach taken by that court.  As revealed in the Air Transport dissent, the
tenuous reasoning on which the majority decision rests provides little basis for
abandoning the approach articulated in American Hospital. Both practical in its
application and faithful to Congressional intent, the American Hospital inquiry
and its focus on the impact of procedural rules on the ultimate rights and
obligations as established by Congress poses the more appealing solution to the
elusive substantive-procedural distinction.

Legal Topics:

For related research and practice materials, see the following legal topics:
Administrative LawAgency RulemakingInformal RulemakingAdministrative LawAgency
RulemakingRule Application & InterpretationGeneral OverviewLabor & Employment
LawOccupational Safety & HealthAdministrative ProceedingsRulemaking

FOOTNOTES:




n1  The first administrative agencies, established by congressional act in 1789,
provided pensions for soldiers wounded in the war and decided the amount of
duties payable on imports.  KENNETH C. DAVIS, 2 ADMINISTRATIVE LAW TREATISE §
1:7, at 17 (2d ed. 1978); see also BERNARD SCHWARTZ, ADMINISTRATIVE LAW § 1.10,
at 20-22 (2d ed. 1984) (discussing the origins of administrative agencies in the
United States).  It was not until the establishment of the Interstate Commerce
Commission in 1887, however, that Congress began to confer upon administrative
agencies broad regulatory powers.  SCHWARTZ, supra, at 21-22 (recognizing this
date as "the beginning of our administrative law").




n2  At the outset of administrative regulation, agencies relied on adjudication
to issue regulatory standards and policy determinations.  RICHARD J. PIERCE,
JR., SIDNEY A. SHAPIORO & PAUL R. VERKUIL, ADMINISTRATIVE LAW AND PROCESS 30-32
(1985) (attributing the success of this "fourth branch of government" to the
reliance on an adversary hearing system and the availability of judicial
review).  Agencies acted in their quasi-judicial function to determine the
rights and obligations of specific parties to an action brought by the agency in
an adversarial setting.  Retrospective in nature, adjudication is governed by
due process principles and is binding only on the parties to the action.  In
contrast, rulemaking developed out of the need for agencies to regulate
effectively on a national scale without relying solely on limited enforcement
resources.  By promulgating rules, the agency acts prospectively, announcing
administrative determinations of general applicability.  For a basic discussion
of the distinction between rulemaking and adjudication, compare Bi-Metallic Inv.
Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 239 U.S. 441 (1915) with Londoner v. City &
County of Denver, 210 U.S. 373 (1908). See also TOM C. CLARK, U.S. DEP'T OF
JUSTICE, ATTORNEY GENERAL'S MANUAL ON THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT (1947)
[hereinafter ATTORNEY GENERAL'S MANUAL], reprinted in GARY J. EDLES & JEROME
NELSON, FEDERAL REGULATORY PROCESS: AGENCY PRACTICES & PROCEDURES 393, 407 (2d
ed. 1989) (discussing the "dichotomy" created by rulemaking and adjudication).




n3  The "enabling" or "authorizing" statute, enacted by Congress, serves many
functions.  The statute authorizes the creation of an agency and provides a
statement of the agency's general purpose.  Congress circumscribes the agency's
scope of regulatory power in an enabling statute and defines the manner in which
an agency may issue guidelines, orders, and rules.  In addition, an enabling
statute establishes the nature of the relationship between an agency and other
branches of government and provides certain controls over agency action through
judicial review, Congressional oversight, and executive scrutiny.  See generally
ARTHUR E. BONFIELD & MICHAEL ASIMOW, STATE AND FEDERAL ADMINISTRATIVE LAW § 7.2,
at 422-23 (1989) (discussing the relationship between administrative agencies
and the elected branch of government that defines the scope of the agency's
authority).




n4  Administrative Procedure Act, 5 U.S.C. §§ 551-559, 701-706, 1305, 3105,
3344, 5362, 7521 (1988) (originally enacted as Administrative Procedure Act,
Pub. L. No. 79-404, 60 Stat. 237 (1946)). Codification of the APA occurred in
1966.  Act of Sept. 6, 1966, Pub. L. No. 89-554, 80 Stat. 378. With the
exception of minor changes in terminology and the assignment of new section
numbers, the substance of the APA has remained largely intact.  See William H.
Allen, The Durability of the Administrative Procedure Act, 72 VA. L. REV. 235,
235 nn.4-5 (1986) (commenting on the purpose of codification and the confusion
which the renumbering of the sections introduced).




n5  While agencies may and often do employ procedures in addition to those
required by the APA, the procedures may not fall below the statutory minima
established by the APA.  ERNEST GELLHORN & RONALD M. LEVIN, ADMINISTRATIVE LAW
AND PROCESS 322 (3d ed. 1990).




n6  See generally 5 U.S.C. § 553. Other sections of the APA concern, for
example, adjudication, id. §§ 554, 556-57, license applications, id. § 558, and
judicial review of agency action.  Id. §§ 701-706.  The APA does not, however,
prescribe the appropriate procedures for state agencies.  State administrative
bodies are governed by the statutory scheme enacted by a state's legislature.
In addition, the Model State Administrative Procedure Act (MSAPA), originally
adopted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws in
1946 and revised in 1961 and again in 1981, has provided the states with a
successful reference point since a number of states have adopted this act either
in its entirety or in substantial part.  MODEL STATE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE
ACT, 1981 Act, 15 U.L.A. 1 (1990) (original version at 9C U.L.A. 179 (1957);
1961 Act at 15 U.L.A. 137 (1990)).  See Arthur E. Bonfield, State Administrative
Policy Formulation and the Choice of Lawmaking Methodology, 42 ADMIN. L. REV.
121, 123 n.5, 135 n.37 (1990) (stating that most states enacted APAs based on
the 1961 MSAPA).  See generally ARTHUR E. BONFIELD, STATE ADMINISTRATIVE
RULEMAKING 12-16 n.20 (1986) (reviewing the 1946, 1961, and 1981 versions of the
Model State Administrative Procedure Act and listing the states that have
enacted an APA based to some degree on the original MSAPA or its 1961 revision).




n7  Informal rulemaking refers to agency action conducted in compliance with
procedures as specified in § 553 of the APA.  That section details the
procedures for public participation in the rulemaking process through notice and
comment.  See infra note 13.  Formal rulemaking, on the other hand, involves
procedures typically reserved for adjudication.  The language "on the record
after opportunity for an agency hearing" in an agency's authorizing statute
automatically invokes §§ 556 and 557 of the APA, replacing public participation
through notice and comment with the increased opportunities for participation
afforded in an administrative hearing.  Although formal rulemaking is
infrequently used, it has been criticized as "vary[ing] from unnecessarily drawn
out proceedings to virtual disasters." Robert W. Hamilton, Procedures for the
Adoption of Rules of General Applicability: The Need for Procedural Innovation
in Administrative Rulemaking, 60 CAL. L. REV. 1276, 1287 (1972); see also PETER
L. STRAUSS, AN INTRODUCTION TO ADMINISTRATIVE JUSTICE IN THE UNITED STATES
155-59 (1989) (describing the courts' reluctance to require formal rulemaking
where such proceedings are "notoriously inconvenient . . . given the frequent
diffuseness of the issues presented and the large number of parties").  See also
United States v. Florida East Coast Ry., 410 U.S. 224 (1973), for an
introductory discussion on the applicability of formal rulemaking.  To
accommodate increasing agency activity with the demand for greater public
participation without having to resort to the delays and complications of formal
rulemaking, legislators and courts have, over the past two decades, begun to
explore alternative measures, developing procedures known as "hybrid rulemaking"
that combine elements from both ends of the spectrum.  GELLHORN & LEVIN, supra
note 5, at 329-32, 335-36.




n8  See 5 U.S.C. § 553(b).  The Federal Register is a daily governmental
publication by which the executive branch informs the public of a wide variety
of agency activities, including an agency's intention to change a rule or issue
a new rule through a proposed rulemaking.  Rules in final form are then
published in the Code of Federal Regulations.  See generally OFFICE OF THE FED.
REGISTER, NAT'L ARCHIVES & RECORDS ADMIN., THE FEDERAL REGISTER: WHAT IT IS AND
HOW TO USE IT (Robert D. Fox & Ernie Sowada, eds., 1985).




n9  5 U.S.C. § 553(c).




n10  Id. § 553(d).




n11  Agency rulemaking rarely affects all members of society.  Rather, the
regulations, standards, and rules that an agency issues are generally targeted
to a specific group of individuals or businesses engaged in a particular
activity.  For example, the regulations promulgated by the United States
Department of Interior detailing federal supervision of state regulatory
programs under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977
potentially affect citizens' groups, coal mine operators, representatives of the
coal industry, and state regulatory agencies.  See National Wildlife Fed'n v.
Hodel, 839 F.2d 694, 702-03 (D.C. Cir. 1988) (concluding that petitioners had
standing to challenge revised regulations as issued by the Secretary).  Rules
frequently affect individuals indirectly, and their scope may not always be
readily apparent.  See, e.g., Air Line Pilots Ass'n v. Quesada, 276 F.2d 892 (2d
Cir. 1960) (holding that the agency action imposing mandatory retirement for
airline pilots over the age of 60 potentially affected 18,000 licensed pilots
under the age of 60 and future airline pilots, not only pilots currently falling
within that category).




n12  National Ass'n of Home Health Agencies v. Schweiker, 690 F.2d 932, 949
(D.C. Cir. 1982), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1205 (1983). In Schweiker, the D.C.
Circuit cited two main reasons for the impetus behind the § 553 procedural
requirements: "First, 'to reintroduce public participation and fairness to
affected parties after governmental authority has been delegated to
unrepresentative agencies.' And second, to 'assure[] that the agency will have
before it the facts and information relevant to a particular administrative
problem, as well as suggestions for alternative solutions.'" Id. (footnote
omitted) (quoting Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 703 (D.C. Cir. 1980) and
Guardian Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Federal Sav. & Loan Ins. Corp., 589 F.2d 658,
662 (D.C. Cir. 1978)); see also United States Dep't of Labor v. Kast Metals
Corp., 744 F.2d 1145, 1151-52 (5th Cir. 1984) (considering the legislative
purposes behind the exemptions of § 553 rulemaking procedures).




n13  The text of § 553 provides in relevant part:

   (b) General notice of proposed rule making shall be published in the Federal
Register, unless persons subject thereto are named and either personally served
or otherwise have actual notice thereof in accordance with law.  The notice
shall include --

   (1) a statement of the time, place, and nature nautre of public rule making
proceedings;

   (2) reference to the legal authority under which the rule is proposed; and

   (3) either the terms or substance of the proposed rule or a description of
the subjects and issues involved.

   Except when notice or hearing is required by statute, this subsection does
not apply --

   (A) to interpretative rules, general statements of policy, or rules of agency
organization, procedure, or practice; or

   (B) when the agency for good cause finds (and incorporates the finding and a
brief statement of reasons therefor in the rules issued) that notice and public
procedure thereon are impracticable, unnecessary, or contrary to the public
interest.

   (c) After notice required by this section, the agency shall give interested
persons an opportunity to participate in the rule making through submission of
written data, views, or arguments with or without opportunity for oral
presentation.  After consideration of the relevant matter presented, the agency
shall incorporate in the rules adopted a concise general statement of their
basis and purpose.  When rules are required by statute to be made on the record
after opportunity for an agency hearing, sections 556 and 557 of this title
apply instead of this subsection.

   (d) The required publication or service of a substantive rule shall be made
not less than 30 days before its effective date, except --

   (1) a substantive rule which grants or recognizes an exemption or relieves a
restriction;

   (2) interpretative rules and statements of policy; or

   (3) as otherwise provided by the agency for good cause found and published
with the rule.

   (e) Each agency shall give an interested person the right to petition for the
issuance, amendment, or repeal of a rule.
5 U.S.C. § 553.




n14  See supra note 13.  Section 553(b)(A) refers only to exempting these rules
from "notice," but "comment" under § 553(c) is invoked only when notice is
mandated.  That is, the introductory phrase to section 553(c) "[a]fter notice
required by this section" makes specific reference to the general notice
provision under section 553(b), establishing notice as a prerequisite to
comment.  See Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1153 n.16; Pickus v. United States Bd. of
Parole, 507 F.2d 1107, 1112 n.9 (D.C. Cir. 1974).




n15  GELLHORN & LEVIN, supra note 5, at 315-20.




n16  See American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037, 1045 (D.C. Cir. 1987).
The court here distinguished legislative rules from non-binding agency action,
the latter of which "carr[ies] no more weight on judicial review than [its]
inherent persuasiveness commands." Id. (quoting Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d
694, 702 (D.C. Cir. 1980)). While the APA does not define the term
"substantive," courts have relied on the interpretation provided in the Attorney
General's Manual on the APA recognizing as such all rules "issued by an agency
pursuant to statutory authority and which implement the statute." ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S MANUAL, supra note 2, reprinted in EDLES & NELSON, at 423 n.3.  Thus,
a clear example of a substantive rulemaking would be the issuance of a
regulation by an agency where Congress has mandated such action but deferred to
the agency's expertise for precise formulation.  As both the APA and its
legislative history are silent on the matter of distinguishing between
"substantive" and "procedural" rules, courts have attributed much weight to the
definition in the Manual.  See, e.g., Chrysler Corp. v. Brown, 441 U.S. 281, 302
n.31 (1979) (citing favorably the interpretation of the Attorney General's
Manual).  The Supreme Court's reliance on the Manual in Vermont Yankee Nuclear
Power Corp. v. Natural Resources Defense Council, Inc., 435 U.S. 519, 546
(1978), further attests to the Manual's usefulness.  In Vermont Yankee, the
Manual provided confirmation of Congress' intent that only agencies, not courts,
may confer additional rulemaking procedures when deemed necessary.  Id. Issued
by the Justice Department following enactment of the APA, the Manual contains
perhaps the closest approximation of congressional intent because of that
agency's considerable participation in the legislative process.  Id.




n17  See BENJAMIN W. MINTZ & NANCY G. MILLER, A GUIDE TO FEDERAL AGENCY
RULEMAKING 49-50, 52-54 & n.62 (2d ed. 1991).  Some courts, however, recognize
the terms "substantive" and "legislative" as interchangeable.  See, e.g., Gibson
Wine Co. v. Snyder, 194 F.2d 329, 331 (D.C. Cir. 1952).




n18  Section 553 also provides for situations in which time constraints and
other concerns necessitate abbreviated rulemaking.  For example, an exemption
from the requirement that substantive rules be issued subject to a 30-day
postponement of effective date is granted in subsection (d) for emergency
rulemaking or for rules which relieve a restriction and therefore require no
public adjustment period.  5 U.S.C. § 553(d); see supra note 13.  While this
exemption applies only to a specific requirement under § 553, others remove
certain agency activity from § 553 applicability altogether.  Such are the
exemptions under § 553(a)(1) for agency activity that concerns "a military or
foreign affairs function of the United States" and under § 553(a)(2) for
"matter[s] relating to agency management or personnel or to public property,
loans, grants, benefits, or contracts." 5 U.S.C. § 553(a).




n19  Guardian Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Federal Sav. & Loan Ins. Corp., 589 F.2d
658, 662 (D.C. Cir. 1978) (citing "effectiveness, efficiency, expedition and
reduction in expense" as the basic reasons behind the exceptions to § 553
procedures); see also American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1045, 1047 (D.C.
Cir. 1987) (explaining that the exemptions were designed to permit agencies to
operate with freedom from costly and time consuming procedures).




n20  The legislative history is equally unrevealing.  See infra notes 31 and
160.




n21  900 F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir. 1990), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991).




n22  Ultimate resolution of the notice-and-comment issue beleaguering rules of
procedure, however, was never achieved in Air Transport. A troubled history
followed the divided Court of Appeals decision.  The Supreme Court granted the
government's petition for certiorari.  111 S. Ct. 669, vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944
(1991). The association, however, filed a motion with the court indicating that
neither it nor its members were interested in pursuing its challenge.  ATA
Supplemental Brief at 11, Air Transp. Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900
F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir. 1990) (No. 89-1195).  Consequently, the Supreme Court
vacated the lower court's order and remanded the case for determination of the
issue of mootness.  900 F.2d 369, vacated, 111 S. Ct 944, and dismissed as moot,
933 F.2d 1043 (D.C. Cir. 1991) (per curiam).  In a separate concurrence, Judge
Silberman revealed his impatience with the course that the case had taken,
reprimanding Air Transport for its "misrepresentations to us, or, in effect, a
confession of error to the Supreme Court after certiorari was granted." Id. at
1043-44 (Silberman, J., concurring).  The issue of ripeness had been argued
before the Court of Appeals at the outset of the litigation, and the court found
in favor of Air Transport holding that the procedural challenge to the rule was
a purely legal issue that presented no reason for delaying judicial review.  900
F.2d at 374.




n23  Wong Yang Sung v. McGrath, 339 U.S. 33, 36-42 (1950); see also DAVIS, supra
note 1, § 1:7, at 24 (stating that "[t]he major effects of the Act were to
satisfy the political will for reform, to improve and strengthen the
administrative process, and to preserve the basic limits upon judicial review").




n24  Wong Yang Sung, 339 U.S. at 36-42.




n25  Id.




n26  Chrysler Corp. v. Brown, 441 U.S. 302, 313 (1979) (quoting Wong Yang Sung,
339 U.S. at 40).




n27  SENATE COMM. ON THE JUDICIARY, 79th Cong., 2d Sess., S. Doc. No. 248 (Comm.
Print 1945), reprinted in LEGISLATIVE HISTORY OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE
ACT at 18-20 (1946); see also Peter J. Henning, Note, An Analysis of the General
Statement of Policy Exception to Notice and Comment Procedures, 73 GEO. L.J.
1007, 1012 (1985) (articulating the policies that support notice and comment as
(1) "allow[ing] the agency to test a proposal before the parties directly
affected by a rule" and (2) "afford[ing] safeguards to private interests").




n28  S. DOC. NO. 248, supra note 27, at 19-20.




n29  Id. In Aiken v. Obledo, 442 F. Supp. 628 (E.D. Cal. 1977), the court
emphasized this objective stating that "[t]he interchange of ideas between the
government and its citizenry provides a broader base for intelligent
decision-making and promotes greater responsiveness to the needs of the people."
Id. at 651.




n30  Air Transport Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d 369, 375
(1990) (quoting Weyerhaeuser Co. v. Costle, 590 F.2d 1011, 1027 (D.C. Cir.
1978)), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991).




n31  See S. DOC. NO. 248, supra note 27, at 18.




n32  Id. at 18-19.




n33  Id. In suggesting the clarification of the word "substantive," the
Committee noted that "strictly speaking, it should be unnecessary to provide . .
. that procedural or organizational rules are exempted; but the exemption was
specified out of an abundance of caution lest it be thought by those unversed in
administrative law definitions that they might be included in the notice
requirement." Id. at 19.




n34  See supra text accompanying note 16.




n35  435 U.S. 519 (1978). In Vermont Yankee, the D.C. Circuit ruled that
compliance with APA procedures was insufficient in the rulemaking proceedings
initiated by the Atomic Energy Commission.  Specifically, the rulemaking at
issue in Vermont Yankee sought to address the question of what consideration was
due to both the environmental effects incident to fuel reprocessing and the
disposal of wastes required as a result of that reprocessing.  The Supreme Court
rejected the lower court's mandate for "a more 'sensitive' application of [the]
devices employed" in the rulemaking proceeding.  Id. at 542. Citing the
legislative history of the APA and the Attorney General's Manual, the Court
emphatically renounced the interference of the lower court in determining the
necessity of additional procedures in administrative rulemaking.  Under the APA,
deference should be accorded to the Commission's deliberate decision not to make
discovery or cross-examination available to the parties in interest.  Only in
"extremely compelling circumstances" might judicially- engrafted procedures be
warranted.  Id. at 543. The Court remanded the decision to assure compliance
with the APA along with the message not to "stray beyond the judicial province
to explore the procedural format or to impose upon the agency its own notion of
which procedures are 'best.'" Id. t at 549.




n36  The Supreme Court in Wong Yang Sung emphasized that it is the
responsibility of the courts "regardless of their views of the wisdom or policy
of the [APA] to construe this remedial legislation to eliminate, so far as its
text permits, the practices it condemns." Wong Yang Sung v. McGrath, 339 U.S.
33, 45 (1950).




n37  Vermont Yankee, 435 U.S. at 542-43.




n38  See, e.g., Air Transport Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d
369 (D.C. Cir. 1990), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991); American Hosp. Ass'n v.
Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037 (D.C. Cir. 1987); United States Dep't of Labor v. Kast
Metals Corp., 744 F.2d 1145 (5th Cir. 1984); Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694
(D.C. Cir. 1980).




n39  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1152.




n40  Not considered here is the view adopted by the Ninth Circuit, which in 1983
rejected the substantial impact test, adhering fast to the explicit
acknowledgment of Congress that certain rules were to be exempt from statutory
procedures notwithstanding their substantive character.  Rivera v. Becerra, 714
F.2d 887, 891 (9th Cir. 1983), cert. denied, 465 U.S. 1099 (1984); Southern Cal.
Edison Co. v. FERC, 770 F.2d 779, 783 (9th Cir. 1985). Following the recent
departure by the D.C. Circuit in Cabais v. Egger, 690 F.2d 234, 238 (D.C. Cir.
1982), whereby the court rejected the substantial impact test for interpretative
rules, the Ninth Circuit held that the rules issued by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission governing the approval of interim rates were properly
promulgated without notice and comment as "technical regulation of the form of
agency action and proceedings." Southern Cal. Edison Co., 770 F.2d at 783
(quoting Pickus v. United States Bd. of Parole, 507 F.2d 1107, 1113 (D.C. Cir.
1974)).




n41  744 F.2d 1145 (5th Cir. 1984).




n42  648 F.2d 694 (D.C. Cir. 1980).




n43  834 F.2d 1037, 1047 (D.C. Cir. 1987).




n44  900 F.2d 369, 378 (D.C. Cir. 1990) (emphasis omitted), vacated, 111 S. Ct.
669 (1991).




n45  Id. at 382 (Silberman, J., dissenting).




n46  268 F. Supp. 90, 97 (D.D.C. 1967) (three-judge court), aff'd per curiam,
393 U.S. 18 (1968).




n47  United States Dep't of Labor v. Kast Metals Corp., 744 F.2d 1145, 1153 (5th
Cir. 1984) (quoting Brown Express, Inc. v. United States, 607 F.2d 695, 702 (5th
Cir. 1979)).




n48  Id.




n49  Id.




n50  744 F.2d 1145 (5th Cir. 1984).




n51  The Occupational Safety and Health Administration was established pursuant
to the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (OSH Act), Pub. L. No. 91-596,
84 Stat. 1592 (codified as amended at 29 U.S.C. 651-678 (1988 & Supp. II 1990)).
Its responsibilities include developing and issuing safety and health
regulations for workers in the United States, conducting investigations and
inspections to promote and ensure compliance with the OSH Act, and enforcing the
OSH Act and the regulations promulgated by OSHA through the issuance of
citations and penalties.  OFFICE OF THE FEDERAL REGISTER, NATL'L ARCHIVES &
RECORDS ADMIN., THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT MANUAL 418 (1991).




n52  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1147-48.




n53  Id. The agency implemented the change because it sought a more objective
and efficient selection methodology.  Id. at 1147. The challenged regulation,
OSHA instruction CPL 2.25B, selected employers for health inspections by ranking
employers according to both the number of hazardous substances involved and data
concerning potential employee exposure to those substances.  Id. at 1147-48 n.1.
On the other hand, selection for safety inspections under CPL 2.25B rests on the
agency's assessment of a company's lost workdays due to injury or illness in
light of national averages.  Id.




n54  Id. at 1153. The court in Kast Metals first established that the OSHA
regulation was, in fact, a rule and thus subject to APA procedural guidelines.
Id. at 1149-51. Applying the substantial impact test, the court held that the
OSHA regulation governing the method of selecting employers for on-site
inspections did not sufficiently affect the rights and interests of Kast Metals
Corporation to render it invalid for promulgation without notice and comment.
Id. at 1154-56.




n55  Id. at 1154-56.




n56  Id. at 1155 (citing Donovan v. Huffines Steel Co., 645 F.2d 288 (5th Cir.
1981), aff'g mem. 488 F. Supp. 995 (N.D. Tex. 1979)).




n57  Id. at 1156.




n58  Id. at 1153.  Throughout the opinion, Judge Goldberg lends his wit to the
discussion of the applicability of § 553(b)(A) to the OSHA regulation.  Id. at
1145 passim. Rejecting the company's contention that notice and comment should
be required where OSHA is merely engaging in a "rational version of
eenie-meenie-minie-moe," the opinion sets the tone for other disgruntled
employers bringing similar actions.  Id. at 1155.  In its final utterance, the
court states: "[l]et the die be Kast." Id. at 1156.




n59  Id. at 1156.  The Kast Metals court cautions against too readily finding a
substantial impact in agency-issued regulations.  Id. The court held that every
agency "proclamation" does not require notice and comment.  Id. "Words such as
'rule,' 'impact,' 'procedure,' et cetera, must contain within their syllables an
alphabetical concatenation: the application of practicality and reasonableness,
and the actual on-the-site effect upon the agency as well as upon the employer
of whatever has been promulgated." Id.




n60  Id. at 1152-53.  "[T]he distinction between a rule of procedure and one of
substance is not black and white." Id. at 1152 (citing Avoyelles Sportsmen's
League, Inc. v. Marsh, 715 F.2d 897, 909 (5th Cir. 1983) and Batterton v.
Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 702-03 nn. 37-38 (D.C. Cir. 1980)).




n61  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1153. The court is cognizant of both the problems
presented by the substantive-procedural distinction, which it readily
acknowledges "def[ies] ready application," as well as the deficiencies of the
substantial impact test which "represent[], albeit imperfectly, the judicial
attempt to pour content into [its] use." Id. at 1154 n.19.




n62  Id. at 1154 n.19.




n63  Id. (citing Rivera v. Becerra, 714 F.2d 887 (9th Cir. 1983), cert. denied,
465 U.S. 1099 (1984)).




n64  Id. The Rivera court posited that Vermont Yankee clearly admonished
reviewing courts from "engraft[ing] 'their own notions of proper procedures upon
agencies' beyond the requirements of section 553." Rivera, 714 F.2d at 891
(quoting Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corp. v. Natural Resources Defense
Council, 435 U.S. 519, 525 (1978)).




n65  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1154 n.19.




n66  Id.  Compare Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 708-10 (D.C. Cir. 1980)
(distinguishing Vermont Yankee because it presented no question as to whether
the agency employed the statutory minima as prescribed by the APA) with
Association of Nat'l Advertisers v. FTC, 617 F.2d 611, 636 (D.C. Cir. 1979)
(interpreting Vermont Yankee as requiring courts to afford agencies "breathing
room to comply with the congressional mandate to work their will within the law,
to experiment and to innovate in the public interest in an effort, among other
things, to relieve the three constitutional branches of some of the more mundane
chores of government" (footnote omitted)).  See also supra note 35.




n67  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1154 n.19.




n68  Id. (stating that the substantial impact test was "no more than the rubric
under which courts construe the terms of the APA").




n69  690 F.2d 234 (D.C. Cir. 1982).




n70  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1154 n.19 (citing Cabais, 690 F.2d at 238).
Although many cases do not reflect a clear distinction among the exemptions
found in § 553(b)(A), the analysis employed for determining the exempt status of
each of the three types of rules -- (1) interpretative rules, (2) general
statements of policy, and (3) rules of agency organization, procedure, or
practice -- has, in general, developed independently.  See GELLHORN & LEVIN,
supra note 5, at 317; see, e.g., Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694 (D.C. Cir.
1980) (evaluating agency rulemaking under each of the three possible
exemptions); American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037 (D.C. Cir. 1987)
(same).  Cabais illustrates that the evaluation of a rule can differ
substantially depending on the type of rule being considered under § 553(b)(A).
Cabais, 690 F.2d at 238.




n71  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1154 n.19 (citing Cabais, 690 F.2d at 237-38).




n72  711 F.2d 295 (D.C. Cir. 1983).




n73  Id. at 328. Without addressing its recent departure in Cabais, the court in
Lamoille Valley articulated the appropriate test as whether a rule "'jeopardizes
the rights and interests of parties.'" Id. (quoting Batterton, 648 F.2d at 708).




n74  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1154 n.19 (citing Lamoille Valley, 711 F.2d at
328); see also infra text accompanying notes 195-204.




n75  The Kast Metals court, in discussing the available approaches to defining "
procedural," alluded to the difficulties underlying the substantial impact test.
Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1154 n.19. In rejecting the claims of the Kast Metals
Corporation, the court addressed the potential reach of the substantial impact
inquiry and conceded that "[a]ll agency rules will in some way affect those
within the agency's grasp." Id. at 1156. In contending with this ambiguous area
of the substantial impact test, the Kast Metals court resorted to an examination
of the purposes that underlie the APA exemptions.  The court characterized the
substantive effect of the OSHA instruction as "derivative" and insufficient to
warrant impeding administrative activity by imposing additional rulemaking
proceedings.  Id. "Administrative agencies should not be straightjacketed by
rulemaking proceedings so as to thwart the exercise of congressional wisdom."
Id. at 1156 n.22.




n76  Id. at 1151-53. The court is aware of the "tension" between agency
efficiency and public participation, but seeks to accommodate congressional
intent to permit abbreviated rulemaking procedures where the rules "do not merit
the administrative burdens of public input proceedings." Id. at 1153; see
Batterton, 648 F.2d at 707 n.73 ("To reach the opposite conclusion would be to
hamstring agencies in their efforts to improve their internal procedures
regarding the way they conduct their business, and rob them of virtually all
flexibility in dealing with increasing workloads." (quoting Hall v. EEOC, 456 F.
Supp. 695, 702 (N.D. Cal. 1978)).




n77  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1156; see National Ass'n of Home Health Agencies
v. Schweiker, 690 F.2d 932, 949 (D.C. Cir. 1982), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1205
(1983) (cautioning courts against freely recognizing exemptions from
notice-and-comment requirements).  Congress addressed this issue stating that
"[n]one of [the] exceptions . . . is to be taken as encouraging agencies not to
adopt voluntary public rule making procedures where useful to the agency or
beneficial to the public." REPORT OF THE SENATE JUDICIARY COMM. ON THE
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT, S. REP. NO. 752, 79th Cong., 1st Sess. 13 (1945),
reprinted in S. DOC. NO. 248, 79th Cong., 2d Sess. 199 (1946) (quoted in
Batterton, 648 F.2d at 701 n.28).




n78  Kast Metals, 744 F.2d at 1154.




n79  Id. at 1156. The regulation at issue in Kast Metals was held to represent
only a minor impact on employers; rather, "[t]he substantive effect of CPL 2.25B
is purely derivative: the source of the employers' woes is the OSH Act itself."
Id.




n80  See supra note 75 and accompanying text.




n81  American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037, 1047 (D.C. Cir. 1987)
(recognizing that "even unambiguously procedural measures affect parties to some
degree"); Neighborhood TV Co. v. FCC, 742 F.2d 629, 638 (D.C. Cir. 1984)
(acknowledging that "all procedural requirements may and do occasionally affect
substantive rights"); Rivera v. Becerra, 714 F.2d 887, 890-91 (9th Cir. 1983)
(rejecting substantial impact test for purposes of determining applicability of
exemption under the APA); Cabais v. Egger, 690 F.2d 234, 237 (D.C. Cir. 1982)
(rejecting substantial impact test as a means for distinguishing between
interpretative and legislative rules).




n82  Courts generally sought to limit the potential reach of the substantial
impact test.  As one court remarked, a case "which at first blush seems to
relate purely to a matter of mechanics, is identified as one that is not free
from difficulty, and calls for judgment." Guardian Fed. Sav. & Loan v. Federal
Sav. & Loan Ins. Corp., 589 F.2d 658, 668 (D.C. Cir. 1978). Substantial impact,
therefore, does not automatically call for notice-and-comment procedures.  Id.;
see also Bowen, 834 F.2d at 1046 ("[T]he mere fact that a rule may have a
substantial impact 'does not transform it into a legislative rule.'").




n83  Courts viewed it as their task to remove procedural rules from the reach of
the exemption under § 553(b)(A) when a substantial impact warranted
notice-and-comment rulemaking procedures.  See, e.g., Aiken v. Obledo, 442 F.
Supp. 628, 649-50 (E.D. Cal. 1977) (revealing that procedural rules with
substantial impact are governed by an "exception to the exemption" under § 553).
Judicial action of this nature was specifically rejected by the Supreme Court in
Vermont Yankee.  See supra note 35.




n84  648 F.2d 694 (D.C. Cir. 1980).




n85  Id. at 709 n.83.




n86  Id. at 696.




n87  The Comprehensive Employment and Training Act, Pub. L. No. 95-524, 92 Stat.
1909 (codified as amended at 29 U.S.C. §§ 801-999 (1988)) (repealed 1982).




n88  Batterton, 648 F.2d at 698.




n89  Id. at 697.




n90  Id. at 699. In addition to the allegation that DOL's rulemaking violated
the prescribed notice-and-comment procedures under the APA, the state also
claimed that the agency failed to meet publication requirements under CETA and
the Freedom of Information Act and that the "Balance of State" method was
arbitrary and capricious.  Id.




n91  The court of appeals reversed the district court's decision, which upheld
the agency determination on various grounds including that the changed
methodology was not a rule as contemplated by the APA.  Id. at 699.




n92  Id. at 711. Although the court found that the issue concerning the specific
reduction of CETA funds had been rendered moot where the funds had already been
spent and where the state had in fact received additional discretionary DOL
funds in excess of the claimed reduction, it was nevertheless able to proceed
because Maryland's stated relief was in the form of protection from similar
modifications in the future.  Id. at 699.




n93  Id. at 710.




n94  Id. at 711.




n95  Id. at 700. The court expressly distinguished its analysis from that of the
substantial impact test, stating that the "'substantial impact' analysis does
not conclude the determination of the legal force of the agency action in future
proceedings while assigning the classification of 'legislative rule' does." Id.
at 709 n.83. Although the court in Batterton focused primarily on the legal
effect of an agency's activity, it noted that the substantial impact test
remains a well-established approach for determining the applicability of the
exemption under § 553(b)(A) for rules of procedure: "[W]e find no reason to
doubt the continued viability of the 'substantial impact' test, as it simply
articulates one of several criteria for evaluating claims of exemption from §
553." Id.




n96  Id. at 699-700. The characterization of agency determinations according to
their legal effect contends nicely with the difficulties inherent in the
substantive-procedural distinction brought about by agency activity that
typically embodies a variety of functions and purposes.  Id. at 702-03. The
Batterton court illustrated its point, stating that "[a]gencies give advice,
enter contracts, stimulate inventions . . . approve rates . . . alleviate
burdens, allocate funds, and issue statements guiding the exercise of such
functions.  Particular actions combine the qualities of interpretative rules,
policies, internal procedures, and legislative rules." Id. at 703.




n97  Id. at 700-04.




n98  Id. at 704.




n99  Id. at 701-02.




n100  Id. at 702 ("Such actions . . . express the agency's intended course of
action, its tentative view of the meaning of a particular statutory term, or
internal house-keeping measures organizing agency activities.  They do not,
however, foreclose alternate courses of action or conclusively affect rights of
private parties.").




n101  The court stated that "where the agency action trenches on substantial
private rights and interests" and "jeopardizes [those] rights and interest[s],"
such action falls outside of the scope of the exemption for rules of agency
organization, procedure, or practice.  Id. at 708.




n102  Id.




n103  Id. at 708-09.




n104  Id. at 709; see also supra text accompanying notes 65-68.




n105  Id.




n106  Id.




n107  Id. at 709 n.83 (referencing DOL's statement that "the 'substantial
impact' test may put a court in the posture of appearing to require procedures
beyond those mandated by statute . . . and in that fashion deviate from the
implications of Vermont Yankee").




n108  See supra note 95.




n109  See supra text accompanying notes 63-68 and 103-07.




n110  834 F.2d 1037 (D.C. Cir. 1987), cited with approval in Reeder v. FCC, 865
F.2d 1298, 1305 (D.C. Cir. 1989) (per curiam).




n111  American Hosp., 834 F.2d at 1047; see also Batterton, 648 F.2d at 707 ("As
Professor Freund explained decades ago, 'even office hours . . . necessarily
require conformity on the part of the public.'" (quoting ERNST FREUND,
ADMINISTRATIVE POWERS OVER PERSONS AND PROPERTY 213 (1928))).




n112  American Hosp., 834 F.2d at 1047. Quoting from Batterton, the court
revealed its approach: "A useful articulation of the exemption's critical
feature is that it covers agency actions that do not themselves alter the rights
or interests of parties, although it may alter the manner in which parties
present themselves or their viewpoints to the agency." Id. (quoting Batterton,
648 F.2d at 707).




n113  Id. (emphasis added).




n114  Peer Review Improvement Act of 1982, Pub. L. No. 97-248, § 143, 96 Stat.
382 (1982) (codified as amended at 42 U.S.C. §§ 1320c to 1320c-22 (1988)).  This
provision was enacted to establish a system that effectively monitors the
medical care provided to Medicare recipients and the corresponding
reimbursements obtained by the medical providers.




n115  American Hosp., 834 F.2d at 1049-1052. The court ruled that three of the
directives were procedural and thus exempt from notice and comment under §
553(b)(A).  The first of these directives, PRO Manual IM85-2, established a
general enforcement plan for the peer review organizations (PROs) that monitor
health care providers participating in the Medicare program.  Id. at 1049. The
70-page document provided for such enforcement standards as requiring PROs to
review at least 5% of all hospital admissions, 100% of all medical procedures
susceptible to abuse (e.g., unnecessary admissions), and to give notice to
hospitals and parties of the reviews being conducted.  Id. The second procedural
directive was PRO Manual IM85-3, which regulated the manner and level of
scrutiny that a PRO must devote to reviewing determinations that a patient is no
longer eligible for Medicare.  Id. at 1051. Finally, PRO Program Directive No. 2
established the terms that must be included in the agreement between hospitals
and their respective PRO.  Id. The other documents issued by HHS in connection
with its plan to implement the 1982 Amendment and reviewed by the court in
American Hospital were the Request for Proposals (soliciting proposals from
organizations seeking to become PROs) as well as the actual contracts that were
to govern the relationship between HHS and the private organizations.  Id. at
1052-57. The court exempted these documents from notice and comment as well,
characterizing them as general policy statements.  Id. The dissent praised the
majority opinion but objected to the court's refusal to require
notice-and-comment procedures for the contract's stated numerical objectives
which the court also identified as general statements of policy.  Id. at 1058
(Mikva, J., concurring in part and dissenting in part).




n116  Id. at 1049 (referring to PRO Manual IM85-2).




n117  Id. at 1050.




n118  Id. at 1057.




n119  Id. at 1044-45. The court in American Hospital proceeded by analyzing the
challenged directives as possibly invoking the exemption for (1) interpretative
rules, (2) statements of general policy, and (3) rules of agency organization,
procedure or practice.  Id. at 1045-48. It reversed the district court ruling in
part because that court failed to consider "the more relevant exemption . . .
for procedural rules." Id. at 1052.




n120  Id. at 1050.




n121  Batterton's move away from the substantial impact test reflected a need to
limit that test because of the view that courts tend to require notice and
comment where a substantial impact was deemed to exist.  Recognizing that
procedural rules were likely to create some form of burden on private parties
and therefore possibly a substantial impact, the Batterton court feared that
this approach might interfere with Congress' express exemption for procedural
rules.  Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 707 (D.C. Cir. 1980) (explaining
Congress' specification for agency efficiency in promulgating procedural rules
but recognizing that "many merely internal agency practices affect parties
outside the agency -- often in significant ways"); see also supra note 82 and
accompanying text.




n122  See Neighborhood TV Co. v. FCC, 742 F.2d 629, 637 (D.C. Cir. 1984)
(holding that the rules designed to govern interim applications for translator
licenses pending rulemaking proceedings were procedural notwithstanding the
incidental effects of a processing freeze and modified tiered approach to
selecting applications for consideration); see also Kessler v. FCC, 326 F.2d
673, 680 (D.C. Cir. 1963) ("procedural rules are those dealing with the method
of operation utilized by the Commission in the dispatch of its business").




n123  Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corp. v. Natural Resources Defense Council,
435 U.S. 519 (1978); see also supra note 35.




n124  See Rivera v. Becerra, 714 F.2d 887, 890 (9th Cir. 1983) (rejecting the
substantial impact test in light of Congress' express exemption in § 553 and the
Supreme Court's mandate in Vermont Yankee), cert. denied, 465 U.S. 1099 (1984);
Cabais v. Egger, 690 F.2d 234, 237 (D.C. Cir. 1982) (interpreting Vermont Yankee
to prohibit courts from imposing notice and comment based on substantial impact
alone).  But see Air Transp. Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d
369, 378 n.13 (D.C. Cir. 1990) (noting that Vermont Yankee is incorrectly
invoked by the dissent because it presupposes compliance with § 553 and its
exemption), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991); Association of Nat'l Advertisers v.
FTC, 617 F.2d 611, 629 & n.20 (D.C. Cir. 1979) (dismissing plaintiffs' claim
that the substantial impact test is no longer valid under Vermont Yankee).  See
generally DAVIS, supra note 1, § 6:35-6:39, at 216 (questioning the "sweeping
dictum" of Vermont Yankee in light of subsequent Supreme Court decisions that
impose procedural requirements in addition to APA procedures).




n125  Chrysler Corp. v. Brown, 441 U.S. 281, 313 (1979).




n126  Id.




n127  American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037, 1047 (D.C. Cir. 1987)
(quoting Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 707 (D.C. Cir. 1980)); see also
Neighborhood TV Co. v. FCC, 742 F.2d 629, 637 (D.C. Cir. 1984) (relying on the
same language in its examination of the substantive-procedural distinction).




n128  900 F.2d 369, 372 (D.C. Cir. 1990), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991).




n129  Id. (quoting National Motor Freight Traffic Ass'n v. United States, 268 F.
Supp. 90, 96 (D.D.C. 1967), aff'd, 393 U.S. 18 (1968)).




n130  See infra text accompanying notes 158-61.




n131  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 381.




n132  53 Fed. Reg. 34646-65, 34656 (Sept. 7, 1988) (codified at 14 C.F.R. Part
13, Subpart G).




n133  Airport and Airway Safety and Capacity Expansion Act of 1987, Pub. L. No.
100-223, Title II, § 204(g) 101 Stat. 1486, 1520-21 (December 30, 1987)
(codified as amended at 49 U.S.C. § 1475 (1988 & Supp. II 1990)) (amending the
Federal Aviation Act of 1958, 49 U.S.C. §§ 1301-1557).  Increasing the
enforcement power of the FAA under the Federal Aviation Act, the Act enabled the
agency to assess civil penalties and to conduct administrative adjudications for
violations of the Federal Aviation Act as well as rules, regulations, and orders
issued by the FAA.  49 U.S.C. § 1475(a).  Civil penalty actions in excess of $
50,000, however, would remain in the hands of the United States Attorney for
prosecution in United States district courts.  Id. at § 1475(c).  The amendment
required the agency to establish a Civil Penalty Assessment Demonstration
Program to monitor the amendment's effectiveness over a two-year period and to
report its findings to Congress within that time.  Pub. L. No. 100-223, §
204(i)(2) (1987) (uncodified).  Subsequent to the enactment, the FAA promulgated
the Rules of Practice for FAA Civil Penalty Actions which articulate the
detailed procedures for civil penalty adjudications.  Rules of Practice for FAA
Civil Penalty Actions, 14 C.F.R. § 13 (1988).  Congress determined the
appropriate level of formality governing such proceedings in the 1987
legislation which prescribed a hearing on the record as established in § 554 of
the APA.  The Air Transport Association challenged these Rules of Practice in
the Air Transport case, and the Court of Appeals as a result held them invalid
in its review of the final rule.




n134  Brief for the Respondents at 3, Air Transport, 900 F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir.
1990) (No. 89-1195) (emphasis omitted).




n135  Section 1475(d)(1) provides that "[a] civil penalty may be assessed under
this section only after notice and opportunity for a hearing on the record in
accordance with section 554 [of the APA]." 49 U.S.C. § 1475(d)(1).  The
legislative history reveals the purposes behind this requirement:

   First, the requirement is intended to advise the FAA of the appropriate level
of procedural formality and attention to the rights of those assessed civil
penalties under this demonstration program.  Secondly, this requirement is
intended to provide reasonable assurance to the potential subjects of such civil
penalties that their due process rights are not compromised.
Brief for Petitioner at 20, Air Transport, 900 F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir. 1990) (No.
89-1195) (quoting H.R. CONF. REP. NO. 484, 100th Cong., 1st Sess. 81 (1987),
reprinted in 1987 U.S.C.C.A.N. 2656).




n136  As reported by the Department of Transportation, the Civil Penalty
Assessment Demonstration Program:

   gives the FAA statutory authority which will better enable [it] to prosecute
airlines which cut corners on maintenance, to prosecute general aviation pilots
who fly through restricted areas and risk not only their own lives, but more
importantly, the lives of many, many others; and to prosecute those who violate
airport security laws.

   . . . We as passengers do not see the myriad of hoses, switches, [and] other
equipment which must work perfectly for the planes to get off the ground, to
perform flawlessly in flight, and then to land safely.  This amendment provides
an incentive for airlines to ensure that these systems are maintained at the
highest of standards.
Brief for the Respondents at 5-6, Air Transport, 900 F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir. 1990)
(No. 89-1195) (quoting 133 CONG. REC. S15293-94 (daily ed. October 28, 1987)
(statement of Sen. Wilson)).




n137  53 Fed. Reg. 34653. The Civil Penalty Assessment Demonstration Program
granted the FAA increased prosecutorial power for a limited two-year period
taking effect on December 31, 1987.  49 U.S.C. § 1475(d)(4) (1988 & Supp. II
1990).




n138  53 Fed. Reg. 34655-65. Following receipt of notice of proposed civil
penalty, the individual charged has three options as to how to proceed: (1) pay
the amount of the penalty upon which the FAA will issue a civil penalty order;
(2) engage in informal settlement proceedings with the FAA; or (3) request a
hearing before an administrative law judge.  Id. at 34654-55 (codified at 14
C.F.R. § 13.16(e)-(1).




n139  Brief for Petitioner at 20, Air Transport, 900 F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir. 1990)
(No. 89-1195).  The claims of the Association were also the subject of a hearing
held before the Subcommittee on Aviation in 1989 where members of the aviation
community and experts in the field of administrative law testified concerning
the FAA Rules of Practice and the "consternation . . . over what some others
think of perhaps as a dry procedural issue." The Civil Penalty Assessment
Demonstration Program of the Federal Aviation Administration: Hearing Before the
Subcomm. on Aviation of the House Committee on Public Works and Transportation,
101st Cong., 1st Sess. 137 (1989) (statement of Robert J. Aaronson, President,
Air Transport Association of America).




n140  Brief for Petitioner at 3, Air Transport, 900 F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir. 1990)
(No. 89-1195) (citing the harmful publicity and the exorbitant costs of
defending against alleged violations as its impetus for seeking to suspend
administrative adjudications pending judicial review of the final rule).




n141  Air Transport challenged eight provisions specifically: (1) issuance of an
Order of Civil Penalty prior to a hearing under 14 C.F.R. §§ 13.16(h), 13.202
(1988); (2) lack of separation of investigatory and adjudicatory functions under
§ 13.203; (3) unequal use of formal admissions under § 13.220(1)(3); (4)
disparate use of opinion testimony under § 13.227; (5) unequal protection from
hearsay testimony under § 13.227; (6) limitation on relevant factual evidence
not directly related to the incident or violation under § 13.227; (7)
prohibition on written arguments during or after the hearing including motions
and proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law under § 13.231; (8) special
accountability of administrative law judges following any reduction of civil
penalty under § 13.232.  See Brief for Petitioner at 20-43, Air Transport, 900
F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir. 1990) (No. 89-1195).




n142  Id. at 20.




n143  Id. at 46-48.  The Association analogized the Rules of Practice to the
"formalized criteria adopted by an agency to determine whether claims for relief
are meritorious" as stated in Pickus.  Id. at 47 (quoting Pickus v. United
States Bd. of Parole, 507 F.2d 1107, 1113 (D.C. Cir. 1974)).




n144  Id. at 47 (Challenging the rules on the grounds of noncompliance with due
process, APA minimum requirements, and the agency's authorizing statute, Air
Transport claimed that public participation in the form of notice and comment
was essential where "[t]he Rule was specifically designed to influence penalty
decisions").  Id.




n145  Brief for the Respondents at 45-49, Air Transport, 900 F.2d 369 (D.C. Cir.
1990) (No. 89-1195).  The FAA also submitted § 553(b)(B), exempting agency
action from notice and comment where "good cause" is indicated, as justification
for proceeding without standard rulemaking procedures.  Id. at 49; see also
supra note 13.




n146  See supra text accompanying note 33.




n147  Air Transp. Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d 369, 375-76
(D.C. Cir. 1990), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991). The "functional analysis" upon
which the Air Transport court relied focuses on the nature of the resulting
consequences of agency action, such as when opportunities are foreclosed or
entitlements jeopardized.  Id. (citing Reeder v. FCC, 865 F.2d 1298, 1305 (D.C.
Cir. 1989) (per curiam); Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 707-08 (D.C. Cir.
1980); Pickus v. United States Bd. of Parole, 507 F.2d 1107, 1113 (D.C. Cir.
1974)).




n148  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 377.




n149  900 F.2d 369 passim. The court even adopted the language of National Motor
Freight as the essential inquiry for determining § 553(b)(A) applicability.
See, e.g., id. at 372, 376-77, 381 (quoting National Motor Freight Traffic Ass'n
v. United States, 268 F. Supp. 90 (D.D.C. 1967) (three-judge court), aff'd, 393
U.S. 18 (1968)).




n150  See, e.g., id. at 377.




n151  Id. at 378.




n152  See supra note 133.




n153  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 376 (citing National Ass'n of Home Health
Agencies v. Schweiker, 690 F.2d 932, 949 (D.C. Cir. 1982), cert. denied, 459
U.S. 1205 (1983); Brown Express, Inc. v. United States, 607 F.2d 695, 702-03
(5th Cir. 1979)).




n154  The Air Transport court was careful to note in expressing its astonishment
over FAA's choices concerning the Rules of Practice that it in no way questioned
the legality of those choices.  Id. at 376 n.8.




n155  Id.




n156  Id. (construing American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037, 1047 (D.C.
Cir. 1987)).




n157  Id. (quoting Chrysler Corp. v. Brown, 441 U.S. 281, 310 (1979)).




n158  See supra note 35.




n159  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 378 n.13. Judge Edwards noted that Vermont
Yankee and its mandate to reviewing courts to refrain from imposing procedural
requirements not listed in the APA were inapplicable where such a court has the
obligation of assessing compliance with APA requirements.  See also supra text
accompanying notes 103-04.  "Section 553 of the APA expressly directs agencies
to engage in notice and comment rulemaking; the issue in this case is whether
the FAA had any ground to disregard this procedural obligation." Air Transport,
900 F.2d at 378 n.13 (emphasis omitted).




n160  Id. at 378 (citing American Hosp., 834 F.2d at 1041, 1047). Judge Edwards
stated for the majority that "[t]he characterizations 'substantive' and '
procedural' -- no more here than elsewhere in the law -- do not guide inexorably
to the right result, nor do they really advance the inquiry very far." Id.
(quoting National Motor Freight Traffic Ass'n v. United States, 268 F. Supp. 90,
96 (D.D.C. 1967) (three-judge court), aff'd, 393 U.S. 18 (1968)). The court
further reasoned that the substantive-procedural distinction misses the point,
for the exemption under § 553 refers not only to rules of procedure, but rather,
to rules of organization, procedure, or practice collectively.  Id. But see
National Motor Freight, 268 F. Supp. at 96, for a discussion of the origin of
the substantive-procedural distinction.  In National Motor Freight, the court
traced the term "substantive" to the Attorney General's Manual on the
Administrative Procedure Act which defined that term in its discussion of the
applicability of § 553 informal rulemaking procedures:

   Substantive rules -- rules . . . issued by an agency pursuant to statutory
authority and which implement the statute, as, for example, the proxy rules
issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to section 14 of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934. . . .  Such rules have the force and effect of
law.
Id. at 97 (quoting the ATTORNEY GENERAL'S MANUAL, supra note 2, at 423 n.3); see
also Chrysler Corp. v. Brown, 441 U.S. 281, 301-03 & nn.31-32 (1979) (relying on
the Attorney General's Manual); id. at 301 ("The central distinction among
agency regulations found in the APA is that between 'substantive rules' on the
one hand and 'interpretative rules, general statements of policy, or rules of
agency organization, procedure, or practice' on the other.").




n161  See, e.g., Neighborhood TV Co. v. FCC, 742 F.2d 629, 637 (D.C. Cir. 1984)
(stating that "[c]ourts have not had an easy time deciding whether particular
agency rules were 'procedural' or 'substantive'"); United States Dep't of Labor
v. Kast Metals Corp., 744 F.2d 1145, 1152 (5th Cir. 1984) (conceding that "the
distinction between a rule of procedure and one of substance is not black and
white"); Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 701-03 (D.C. Cir. 1980) (comparing
substantive and non-binding rules while acknowledging that infinite variations
of agency activity defy neat characterization); Brown Express, Inc. v. United
States, 607 F.2d 695, 701 (5th Cir. 1979) (finding that the terms "substantive"
and "procedural" "are legal conclusions which depend upon their settings for
definition"); Aiken v. Obledo, 442 F. Supp. 628, 649 (E.D. Cal. 1977) (holding
that the collateral contact rule issued by the United States Department of
Agriculture "does not squarely fall within either the 'procedural' or the
'substantive' categories [sic]"); Pharmaceutical Mfrs. Ass'n v. Finch, 307 F.
Supp. 858, 863 (D. Del. 1970) (stating that "[a]ttempting to provide a facile
semantic distinction . . . does little to clarify whether the regulations here
involved are subject to the notice and comment provisions . . . of the [APA]").




n162  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 381 (Silberman, J., dissenting).




n163  Id. at 382 (stating that the Rules of Practice fit within the exemption
under § 553(b)(A) because they "deal with enforcement or adjudication of claims
of violations of the substantive norm but . . . do not purport to affect the
substantive norm").




n164  Id. at 383 (citing generally Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corp. v. Natural
Resources Defense Council, 435 U.S. 519 (1978)).




n165  Id. at 381.




n166  Id.




n167  Id. at 382 (citing Toilet Goods Ass'n v. Gardner, 387 U.S. 158, 164
(1967)). "Primary conduct" has also been used in contending with the
difficulties surrounding the substantive-procedural distinction embodied in the
Erie Doctrine based on the landmark case of Erie R.R. v. Tompkins, 304 U.S. 64
(1938). Most notably, Justice Harlan employed the term "primary conduct" in his
concurring opinion in Hannah v. Plumer, 380 U.S. 460, 477 (1965) (Harlan, J.,
concurring), as a gloss on the substantive-procedural distinction.  See also
EUGENE F. SCOLES & PETER HAY, CONFLICT OF LAWS § 3-36, at 110 (1982), for a
discussion of the Erie Doctrine.  See generally John H. Ely, The Irrepressible
Myth of Erie, 87 HARV. L. REV. 693 (1974) (discussing the Erie line of cases and
attributing the continued importance of the Erie Doctrine in part to Justice
Harlan's concurrence in Hannah v. Plumer).




n168  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 382.




n169  Id. at 381.




n170  Id. at 383. See supra text accompanying notes 108-27.




n171  Id.




n172  Id. By comparison, the substantial impact test as applied in Kast Metals
looks to see only whether a given regulation "goes beyond formality and
substantially affects the rights of those over whom the agency exercises
authority." Pickus v. United States Board of Parole, 507 F.2d 1107, 1113 (D.C.
Cir. 1974); see supra text accompanying notes 46-79.




n173  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 382.




n174  Id.; see also supra notes 31-33 and accompanying text.




n175  The Air Transport decision, although subsequently vacated and dismissed,
revealed the controversy surrounding the issue and the uncertainty with which
agencies must contend.  See, e.g., Tracy C. Hauser, Survey, The Administrative
Procedure Act, Procedural Rule Exception to the Notice and Comment Requirement
-- A Survey of Cases, 5 ADMIN. L.J. AM. U. 519, 550 (1991).




n176  See supra text accompanying notes 41-45; Jeffrey S. Lubbers & Nancy G.
Miller, The APA Procedural Rule Exemption: Looking For a Way to Clear the Air, 6
ADMIN. L.J. AM. U. 481, 489-93 (1992) (responding to the Hauser Article and
arguing that Judge Silberman's "primary conduct" test represents "an improvement
on the tests that currently exist" and that agencies should voluntarily engage
in notice-and-comment procedures for procedural rules where attendant costs do
not outweigh the benefits).




n177  The court in Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694 (D.C. Cir. 1980),
suggested that simply the appearance of "fair consideration" and the desire to
reduce the amount of litigation provide a considerable incentive for using
notice-and-comment procedures.  Id. at 701 n.28.




n178  Id. at 704 (announcing that "[e]xemptions should be recognized only where
the need for public participation is overcome by good cause to suspend it, or
where the need is too small to warrant it"); see also supra text accompanying
notes 32-33.




n179  Air Transp. Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d 369, 382 (D.C.
Cir. 1990) (Silberman, J., dissenting), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991); see also
EDLES & NELSON, supra note 2, at 66-67 ("The likelihood that a regulation will
pass muster as 'procedural' is in direct proportion to its insignificance").




n180  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 382.




n181  Id.




n182  See supra text accompanying notes 108-27.




n183  Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 708-09 n.83 (D.C. Cir. 1980), cited
with approval in Cabais v. Egger, 690 F.2d 234, 237 (D.C. Cir. 1982) (evaluating
the impact of Vermont Yankee on the substantial impact test).




n184  Batterton, 648 F.2d at 708-09 n.83.




n185  See supra text accompanying notes 111-12.




n186  Batterton, 648 F.2d at 708-09 n.83 (citing Joseph v. United States Civil
Serv. Comm'n, 554 F.2d 1140, 1154 n.26 (D.C. Cir. 1977)).




n187  Guardian Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Federal Sav. & Loan Ins. Corp., 589
F.2d 658, 662 (D.C. Cir. 1978). The court in Guardian Federal discussed the
underlying policy reasons of § 553 stating that "[p]ublic rulemaking procedures
increase the likelihood of administrative responsiveness to the needs and
concerns of those affected.  And the procedure for public participation tends to
promote acquiescence in the result even when objections remain as to substance."
Id., quoted in American Postal Workers Union v. United States Postal Serv., 707
F.2d 548, 565 (D.C. Cir. 1983), cert. denied, 465 U.S. 1100 (1984).




n188  Batterton, 648 F.2d at 702 (quoting the APA, 5 U.S.C. § 706(2)(A)(1976));
see generally DAVIS, supra note 1, § 6:6.




n189  Batterton, 648 F.2d at 702 (citation omitted).




n190  See supra text accompanying notes 95-107.




n191  See supra text accompanying notes 63-64.




n192  See supra text accompanying note 69.  The substantial impact test
continues to apply to general statements of policy, also exempted under section
553(b)(A) from notice-and-comment procedures.




n193  Brown Express, Inc. v. United States, 607 F.2d 695, 700 (5th Cir. 1979)
(quoting Gibson Wine Co. v. Snyder, 194 F.2d 329, 331 (D.C. Cir. 1952)). Relying
on Gibson Wine, the court in American Hospital summarized the difference between
interpretative rules which "explain ambiguous terms in legislative enactments"
and legislative rules "which create law, usually implementary to an existing
law." American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037, 1045 (D.C. Cir. 1987).




n194  American Postal Workers Union v. United States Postal Serv., 707 F.2d 548,
559 (D.C. Cir. 1983), cert. denied, 465 U.S. 1100 (1984) (characterizing rule
which calculates retirement benefits as interpretative although it reduces
substantially the amount of benefits received by 113,000 postal workers); see
also Rivera v. Becerra, 714 F.2d 887, 891 (9th Cir. 1983) (rejecting substantial
impact test for rules interpreting pension offset rules); Cabais v. Egger, 690
F.2d 234, 237-38 (D.C. Cir. 1982) (concluding that rule requiring offset of
pension income by unemployment benefits is interpretative).  The substantial
impact test, however, did at one time predominate in the determination of
exemption for interpretative rules as a means of effectuating the goals of § 553
notice and comment.  See, e.g., Pharmaceutical Mfrs. Ass'n v. Finch, 307 F.
Supp. 858, 863 (D. Del. 1970) (invalidating retroactive regulations that
required additional evidence for the approval of marketed drug products because
of the substantial impact on pharmaceutical companies).




n195  Cabais, 690 F.2d at 237. Not all circuits have arrived at the same
conclusion as the District of Columbia Circuit.  See, e.g., American
Bancorporation v. Board of Governors of Fed. Reserve Sys., 509 F.2d 29, 33 (8th
Cir. 1974) (regarding the challenged rule's impact as the crucial inquiry in
determining its substantive or interpretative nature).




n196  Cabais, 690 F.2d at 237-38 n.6. (citing Independent Broker-Dealers Trade
Ass'n v. SEC, 442 F.2d 132, 144 (D.C. Cir. 1971), cert. denied, 404 U.S. 828
(1971)).




n197  See Cabais, 690 F.2d at 237-38 n.6; see also supra note 33 and
accompanying text.




n198  Id. For example, in the context of the FAA Rules of Practice, the FAA
argued that the issue of the validity of its rulemaking was premature.  Air
Transp. Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d 369, 374 (D.C. Cir.
1990), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991). Rather, the appropriate opportunity for
challenging the rules adheres when the agency has applied the rules in a
specific enforcement proceeding.  Id.




n199  Cabais, 690 F.2d at 237-38 n.6. Courts may defer to agencies but are not
constrained to adopt the challenged agency interpretation.  American Postal
Workers Union v. United States Postal Serv., 707 F.2d 548, 561 (D.C. Cir. 1983).




n200  See, e.g., Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 375 (substantial effect on civil
penalty defendants' rights implicates notice and comment); American Hosp. Ass'n
v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037, 1047 (D.C. Cir. 1987) (substantial impact test provides
basis for new formulation); United States Dep't of Labor v. Kast Metals Corp.,
744 F.2d 1145, 1154 n.19 (5th Cir. 1984) (substantial impact test applies to
procedural rules); Lamoille Valley R.R. v. ICC, 711 F.2d 295, 328 (D.C. Cir.
1983) (substantive consequences determine eligibility for exemption).




n201  Lamoille Valley, 711 F.2d at 328. The court stated the test without
acknowledging the Cabais decision or its reasoning.  Id. This suggests
considerable independence between interpretative rules and rules of agency
organization, procedure, or practice for the purpose of evaluating the
applicability of the exemption provision.




n202  See cases cited supra note 200.




n203  American Hosp., 834 F.2d at 1047. The American Hospital court elaborated
on the substantial impact inquiry, acknowledging the fact "that even
unambiguously procedural measures affect parties to some degree," and curbed the
tendency of the substantial impact test to impose indiscriminately notice and
comment on procedural rules.  Id.  See supra text accompanying note 113.




n204  American Hosp., 834 F.2d at 1047.




n205  Cabais v. Egger, 690 F.2d 234, 237 (D.C. Cir. 1982) ("Interpretative and
substantive rules may both vitally affect private interests. . . .").




n206  See supra text accompanying note 111.




n207  American Hosp., 834 F.2d at 1051. The court conceded that Manual IM85-2
might burden health care providers with the unconditional compliance that
increased enforcement suggests, but it went so far as to qualify that claim as
"patently illegitimate" for objecting to measures which expose violations of the
Medicare Act.  Id.




n208  See id. at 1047, 1051 (characterizing the effects of the HHS enforcement
scheme as "incidental mechanical burdens").




n209  See supra note 115 and accompanying text.




n210  In American Hospital, the "incidental inconveniences" imposed by the first
PRO Manual constituted minor burdens that do not justify the imposition of
notice-and-comment procedures.  American Hosp., 834 F.2d at 1051. Similarly, the
PRO Manual IM85-3 and the Program Directive No. 2 "neither change[] the standard
of PRO review, nor impose[] anything greater than incidental mechanical burdens
on regulated hospitals." Id.




n211  See supra text accompanying notes 197-99.




n212  Judicial review of final decisions and orders of penalty assessment issued
by the FAA is contemplated in the Demonstration Program itself.  See 14 C.F.R. §
13.235 (1992).




n213  As stated by the Batterton court in its comparison of legislative rules
with their counterpart, "non-binding agency statements carry no more weight on
judicial review than their inherent persuasiveness commands." Batterton v.
Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 702 (D.C. Cir. 1980) (citing General Elec. Co. v.
Gilbert, 429 U.S. 125, 141 (1976)).




n214  See supra text accompanying note 130.




n215  See Hauser, supra note 175, at 550.




n216  Air Transp. Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d 369, 372 (D.C.
Cir. 1990), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991) (citing National Motor Freight Ass'n
v. United States, 268 F. Supp. 90 (D.D.C. 1967) (three-judge court), aff'd, 393
U.S. 18 (1968)); see supra notes 146-51 and accompanying text.




n217  National Motor Freight, 268 F. Supp. at 96.




n218  Judge Silberman in his dissent questioned the majority's reliance on the
"old and now discredited district court case." Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 383
(Silberman, J., dissenting).  Furthermore, National Motor Freight received only
a summary affirmation by the Supreme Court, rendering its reasoning suspect.
Id. In general, courts are less inclined to overrule a decision that has been
affirmed by an opinion that discusses the merits.  Under Anderson v. Celebrezze,
460 U.S. 780 (1983), "[a] summary disposition affirms only the judgment of the
court below, and no more may be read into our action than was essential to
sustain that judgment." Id. at 785 n.5, quoted in Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 383
(Silberman, J., dissenting); see also Edelman v. Jordan, 415 U.S. 651, 670-71
(1974) (limiting the precedential value of summary affirmances).  The dissent in
Air Transport therefore dismissed the majority's faithful alignment with the
reasoning advanced in National Motor Freight.  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 383
(Silberman, J., dissenting).




n219  National Motor Freight, 268 F. Supp. at 96 (stating that "[t]he Commission
was . . . under no injunction from Congress" to establish informal settlement
procedures).




n220  Id. at 92-93.




n221  Id. at 96. The dissent emphasized this factual distinction in discrediting
the majority's reliance on National Motor Freight.  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at
384 n.3. Judge Silberman noted this disparity between the administrative scheme
of informal settlements established in National Motor Freight and the Rules of
Practice developed by the FAA in Air Transport, but placed primary emphasis in
his decision on the dubious precedential value of the National Motor Freight
decision.  Id.




n222  49 U.S.C. § 1475(d)(1) (1988 & Supp. II 1990).  Other limitations
established by Congress in the Demonstration Program allowed the FAA to assess
civil penalties only on actions initiated after December 30, 1987, not in excess
of $ 50,000, and only for a one-and-a-half year period.  Id. at §
1475(d)(2)-(4); see also supra note 133.




n223  Tabb Lakes, Ltd. v. United States, 715 F. Supp. 726, 728 (E.D. Va. 1988)
(quoting American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F.2d 1037, 1045 (D.C. Cir. 1987),
aff'd, 885 F.2d 866 (4th Cir. 1989)).




n224  See Association of Nat'l Advertisers v. FTC, 617 F.2d 611, 629 n.20 (D.C.
Cir. 1979) (Skelly, C.J., concurring in result only) (distinguishing National
Motor Freight because that procedural challenge did not involve a rule which
sought "to follow congressionally prescribed procedures" and judicial review was
"limited or non-existent").




n225  Air Transport Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d 369, 377
(D.C. Cir. 1990), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991) (quoting American Hosp., 834
F.2d at 1057 (citation omitted)).




n226  Id.




n227  742 F.2d 629, 637 (D.C. Cir. 1984).




n228  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 377.




n229  Neighborhood TV, 742 F.2d at 631-34.




n230  Id. at 632.




n231  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 377.




n232  Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 708 (D.C. Cir. 1980); see supra text
accompanying notes 91-94.




n233  See supra note 13.




n234  Elsewhere in the law, courts have had to attend to the substantive-
procedural distinction in determining the validity of rules that govern
adjudicatory matters.  In re Gailey, Inc. contemplated the definition of "
procedural" to ascertain the validity of a retroactivity provision.  In re
Gailey, Inc., 119 B.R. 504, 510 (Bankr. W.D. Pa. 1990). The court concluded that
"if it . . . merely prescribes a method for enforcing [substantive rights] or
for obtaining redress for a grievance," the provision will be upheld as
procedural.  Id.; see also Masino v. Outboard Marine Corp., 88 F.R.D. 251, 255
(E.D. Pa. 1980) (holding "majority verdict rule" to be procedural in determining
the appropriate law to be applied in diversity suit because it "prescribe[s] the
manner in which . . . rights and responsibilities may be exercised and enforced
in a court"), aff'd, 652 F.2d 330 (3d Cir.), cert. denied, 454 U.S. 655 (1981).




n235  See discussion supra part I.B-C.




n236  See Air Transp. Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d 369, 382
(D.C. Cir. 1990) (Silberman, J., dissenting), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991)
(articulating that rules with a substantial impact "purport to direct, control,
or condition the behavior" of private parties); see also supra text accompanying
note 172.




n237  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 382. Judge Silberman believes that where
aggrieved parties have an opportunity to contest the procedural validity of an
agency's action in a related adjudication initiated by the agency at a later
time, congressional intent to promote agency activity by exempting informal
rulemaking procedures must prevail over the benefits obtained from public
participation.  See also supra text accompanying notes 196-99.




n238  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 383.




n239  Id.




n240  See Cabais v. Egger, 690 F.2d 234, 237 (D.C. Cir. 1982); supra text
accompanying notes 69-74 and 191-99.




n241  Cabais, 690 F.2d at 237 (citing Batterton v. Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 709
n.83 (D.C. Cir. 1980)); see also supra note 35.




n242  Cabais, 690 F.2d at 237.




n243  See id.; see also supra note 195 and accompanying text.




n244  Cabais, 690 F.2d at 237.




n245  Id. at 237 n.6.




n246  See supra text accompanying notes 112-13.




n247  See supra notes 95-100 and accompanying text.




n248  See Air Transport Ass'n of Am. v. Department of Transp., 900 F.2d 369, 382
(D.C. Cir. 1990) (Silberman, J., dissenting), vacated, 111 S. Ct. 944 (1991);
see also supra text accompanying note 237.




n249  Air Transport, 900 F.2d at 384 n.3.




n250  See supra notes 218-20 and accompanying text.




n251  See supra notes 132-35, 221-22 and accompanying text.




n252  See supra text accompanying note 223; see also supra text accompanying
note 194.




n253  See supra notes 31-33 and accompanying text.




n254  See supra text accompanying note 174.




n255  The Administrative Conference of the United States (ACUS) has in the past
recommended the elimination of the exemptions under § 553 in favor of public
participation, thereby allowing some procedural rules to remain exempt under §
553(a)(2) as "matters of agency management and personnel." Recommendation 69-8,
"Elimination of Certain Exemptions from the APA Rulemaking Requirements," 1
C.F.R. § 305.69-8 (1992); Recommendation 76-5, "Interpretative Rules of General
Applicability and Statements of General Policy," 1 C.F.R. § 305.76-5 (1992);
Recommendation 83-2, "The 'Good Cause' Exemption from APA Rulemaking
Requirements," 1 C.F.R. § 305.83-2 (1992).  Similarly, the states have generally
restricted exempting procedural rulemaking from statutory purposes except for
matters of internal management, an equivalent to the § 533(a)(2) provision.




n256  American Hosp. Ass'n v. Bowen, 834 F. 2d 1037, 1047 (D.C. Cir. 1987).




n257  Pharmaceutical Mfrs. Ass'n v. Finch, 307 F. Supp. 858, 863 (D. Del. 1970).




n258  The Batterton court in its discussion of legislative and non-legislative
rules noted the incidental benefit of "giv[ing] the public a sense of fair
consideration" in addition to that of avoiding litigation.  Batterton v.
Marshall, 648 F.2d 694, 701 n.28 (D.C. Cir. 1980) (citing Guardian Fed. Sav.
Ass'n & Loan v. Federal Sav. & Loan Ins. Corp., 589 F.2d 658, 669 (D.C. Cir.
1978)).


